Max and I caught our breath while Sverre dug out the trunk as deep as he could manage, and then set to hacking with a will. He paused, rested back on his heels and said, "This is going to be really heavy to carry home." We assured him we would help. He reached down, grasped the tree firmly around the trunk, pulled...
But wait, in a post apocalyptic world there won’t be any refrigeration. That cut out my cattle aspirations for a PAW scenario. So I started looking at smaller animals, next on the list was pigs. Again, they’re kind of big to butcher without refrigeration, but if you butcher small or have family and friends that will be with you, a medium sized pig will feed about 10-20 people. Seeing the benefits of this, I have begun to routinely keep pigs and will be starting a breeding program with them in the near future.
It seems rather cliche’ to say, but successful landscape photography really is dependent upon the light one chooses to work with. Yet it amazes me that I continually hear from other pros and readers of this blog that they disagree. I’m not writing this piece to change anyone’s mind – so please save the nasty emails and comments. For “me,” and I can’t emphasize that strongly enough, my best images constantly are the direct result of working with quality light. My definition of “quality light” begins with dawn light, continues through sunrise, but ends when the warmth begins to leave (typically 30-60 minutes after sunrise on a clear day). Conversely, it arrives with the late light of the day, usually around 60-90 minutes prior to sunset through the end of civil twilight (which varies based on time of the year). Clouds and fog provide a soft light that also allows me to shoot during the middle of the day. Beyond that, indirect light (open shade) is the only other type of light that I will consider working under. Harsh mid-day light (tourist light) is simply not my cup of tea.
So I’m not sure where that leaves me. I was feeling positive about reconciling, but now I’m not sure he has the emotional capacity to do the work that it takes. He just wants to “forget and move past.” That’s not going to work for me. We shall see.
I have passed the line for my 100th blog follower, and I couldn’t be happier! Apparently this is a great day for milestones!
"Pours a spectacular crimson red with a creamy tan head. Brewed with four varieties of Belgian caramel malts imparting a sweet richness. Red's Rye is impressively balanced with its hop bitterness and huge citrus bouquet achieved from the immense amarillo dry hop. The generous amount of malted rye used accentuates a spicy crisp finish."
and lifts the needy from the ash heap;
You’re good at it. Better than they would be, if you gave them a chance. They had their chance when you were young, and they blew it. They let you get big enough and old enough to steal the knife, to take charge, to show them you can do it all by yourself.
After everyone left, my mom and I decided to go to Midnight Mass. It was...ok. I used to love going to church but ever since the Catholic church decided to completely change everything about Mass, I'm finding it a lot harder to enjoy Mass.
When things on their side looked bleak,
The highest as the lowest form of criticism is a mode of autobiography. Those who find ugly meanings in beautiful things are corrupt without being charming. This is a fault.
But the most foolish things are this pointless thoughts..
Despite being invited by the Opposition Leader Datuk Seri Anwar Ibrahim, the group insists they are independent, claiming that their expenses for the fact-finding mission are being borne by themselves or their respective governments.
He made it.
"Not if you don't tell him!" Lyra hissed.
It’s a win-win for Monsanto. But it’s a loss for just about everyone else.
4. FroYo World is coming to my small town and I'm ecstatic!!!
My mom bends over backwards for Ken...he needs gas money, she gets it for him (after his family has said nope) he needed warmer clothes...she got them for him, he never gives her credit for anything. His total lack of respect for her, and me is getting old real quick.
'Gypsy Moth Antiques'...
This morning we wasted yet a bit more diesel and headed back home via Haydon Bridge, The Old Repeater Station and Black Carts. (May need to push the car to school and back on Friday!) We stopped to take photographs at the first two and donned walking boots for the latter. Although the sun was out the temperature remained a cool 2C though a north westerly wind made it feel distinctly colder. By the time we finally returned to the car our hands were freezing and our ears hurt from the cold. Still this is our ‘retaining sanity time’ and always makes us feel better afterwards.
It is hard to deal with
Today is fiction: I’m anticipating editing Babel.
I’ve also worked out all of the bugs in the grid so I no longer have to do the same work 8 times (Thank goodness).
I was a little embarrassed standing outside my car, wrestling with my pants over who gets the keys, so I popped the trunk and put the milk in and sat inside the car trying (and failing) to get the darn keys off my belt loop (and pocket. Apparently, that was my downfall.)
swings a silver cane,
Finally, the music of Faust. Just as Sokurov relied on Arbov for most of his cinematic works for developing his screenplays, Sokurov leans on Andrey Sigle for weaving the music in most of his films. While one could argue that Sokurov’s choice of music of Mahler, Tchaikovsky and Wagner was impeccable, it young Sigle who presents his creativity in weaving those musical works and that of the opera Faust by Charles Gounod while adding his own. It is rather difficult to appreciate Sigle’s contribution to the film for the uninitiated as the bars of the famous composers tend to dominate. Sokurov has achieved in Faust what Terrence Malick achieved with Alexandre Desplat in The Tree of Life. In both films, the respective directors pick up strands of existing music by great composers and then use the likes of Sigle and Desplat to provide new music that blends with the music already chosen by the director. While viewing the film Faust, anyone who can appreciate music would be tempted to close their eyes time and time again and let their ears feast on what Sokurov provides.
“There are times when I look over the various parts of my character with perplexity. I recognize that I am made up of several persons and that the person that at the moment has the upper hand will inevitably give place to another. But which is the real one? All of them or none?”
2005 Bindaree (11th), 2006 Baron Windrush (UR 3rd); 2007 Knowhere (UR 8th); Naunton Brook (PU bef 23rd), 2008 Fundamentalist (Fell 3rd), Ardaghey (Fell 4th), Naunton Brook (PU 19th), Knowhere (UR 25th); 2009 Battlecry (16th), Ollie Magern (Fell 2nd), Fundamentalist (PU 21st), Knowhere (PU 25th); 2010 Hello Bud (5th), Beat The Boys (PU 19th), Ballyfitz (Fell 22nd), Ollie Magern (PU 28th); 2011 Hello Bud (PU 29th), Grand Slam Hero (Fell 13th)
for you to participate in so you can join the celebration
Positive energizers:
Anyway, they all go to bed but Park Ha can’t sleep. She keeps remembering what Modern Evil Sister said to her while Crown Prince can’t sleep either because he keeps thinking of Modern Evil Sister as Joseon Evil Sister.
Looks like he just stepped off a Prada runway and yet he only paid $6 for this coat.
My pattern is the Boy Brief Unisex Underwear pattern from Kitschy Coo. It is perfect for those little strips of fabric that I always end up with. As a bonus, this wonderful jersey has stretch in both directions, so I can cut my bands in whichever direction I happen to have fabric and they still stretch perfectly. Love that.
Take a look at the second line of text on this page. I had made a mistake so I covered it with another piece of that painted, recycled book and rewrote the words. When an eraser won't work, figure something else out. There's always a way to 'fix' a problem! And, because I can't let anything go, the grid lines on this page are the tiny bits of torn off paper left because I had wanted torn edges on the page in yesterday's post.
Haha, I love this photo!
Go and Create!
So to comapre prices. My normal detergent is $5 for 50 loads (certain loads I only use half as much as recommended).
I knew there would come a day I could show everyone “Curious George”. The first of and interesting week of posts for me and for you,
Wade Brian Green, 42, Westbury, N.Y.
You may be aware that nothing is done on a small scale in the States and in keeping with that Herculean sense of bigness the GABF is the GBBF super-sized. And I’m not just talking about the festival itself, but also the judging. The sheer level of professionalism at the GABF is something to behold and I believe all of us who run, or participate in, beer competitions can really learn from this.
Remember, average is just that. Average.
“Is he good to you?” His eyes lifted and pleaded with mine.
The results of this during the course were clear. The mixture of hands-on activities and classroom-based discussions, where the delegates were encouraged to give their feedback, led to a significant change in behaviour. By Day 2 they were being more honest with one another which enabled them to be much more efficient in their tasks, and I felt a real bond had formed. This certainly can only have a positive impact on them professionally.
6. Blue Breeze (Oberg, Fredriksz) 8:23
I recommend y’all to go see this collection(click the link above to see the facebook event page) and if you are rich enough, buy a pair but most of all, go have fun, try on the stunners, take pictures, and support the great talent. The exhibition is in conjunction with photographer extraordinaire Sylvia Njenga Gichia (she did the photography) and George Ndagu. The model is Lynnet.
Joy the Baker – a great blogger with great recipes. I love the cake that she is holding. I saw an insert of her story and loved the way she talks about cooking and herself.
You will have the opportunity to revise your query after the Shark bites, and have it critiqued again. Many of the people who do that get substantially better.
I'll try a brown, for a while, instead. I'll let you all know what I come up with for a recipe. I won't be able to brew it for a couple of weeks, though, due to time constraints. Darn!
Original Air Date: June 25, 2010
Strictly Bi : Eye Of The Beholder - Jamie Joy Gatto
Obama asks for two years of service back to the country in exchange for college subsidies. Yes, he wants out of Iraq immediately (which I also question) but then wants to redouble efforts in Afghanistan and go after Al Qaeda. This isn’t your typical tax-and-spend Democrat peacenik. After 8 years of a Republican who never met a spending bill he couldn’t get behind, I’m not sure we’re going to be committing more federal funds.
M. Pax’s inspiration comes from the wilds of Oregon, especially the high desert where she shares her home with two cats and a husband unit. Creative sparks also come from Pine Mountain Observatory where she spend her summers working as a star guide. She writes mostly science fiction and fantasy, but confesses to an obsession with Jane Austen. She blogs
I put each pile into a baggie, and also included a baggie of toothpicks, a washcloth and these instructions:
Now, however, these “jack-booted thugs” – as they were often called – were pushing into the swamp. They were bringing the fight to the folks who had made the swamp their home after the crash – people who were merely trying the best they knew how to keep themselves and their families alive.
You can reach me through Killer Yapp.
Our parents too are a gift of life and divinity from life and divinity, as our children.
1) The German city of Koblenz was partially evacuated over the weekend so that two still active WWII-era bombs—including one weighing 1.8 tons—could be defused. The bombs "were discovered when water levels fell because of a prolonged dry spell," the BBC reports. As it happens, "600 tons of old munitions from two world wars [are] discovered every year" in Germany, with this perhaps being one of the few examples of discovery-by-drought.
A ruffled tea towel.
I had the perfect designer paper for my card. Which is the reason I chose these colors to begin with.
Fight!
Anyway, our pico de gallo was simple, simple: cherry tomatoes, minced jalapeño, onion, and cilantro, the juice of half a lime and a pinch of salt. Nothin’ to it.
It doesn't make sense.
The animals simply will be safer at the zoo, they said.
So he was doing some stuff, and then he said that there was going to be another shot of pain, and this would be worse than the last. Fuck. “Ok, good to know,” I said. And as I clenched my fists to try to have control over some part of my body, the pain hit me. I gasped again, but remembered this time to breathe. And as I breathed back out I said, “JEEEEZUS!” almost involuntarily.
Here are a few, just to get a feeling of what I'm talking about. I don't even want to start to address them right now, they are so ridiculous. I might do a follow-up post later... but right now, just read these.
a relentless desire to correct culture.
Now when I see her, she turns her head and hurries past, pretending she hasn’t seen me. And I wonder what I did to make her so bitter that she would throw away our beautiful friendship, without giving me the grace to try to save it.
From the first day containers of building materials arrived at the Hospital, area residents have come forth to help. A local French teacher is now serving as translator for the crew, as well as site administrator. Another man, at the hospital with his wife – an amputee receiving therapy – joined the construction crew. As HN leader Ron White reports, “we showed up and so did they – we share the same mission.”
"Murphy's generic one-size-fits-all pyramidally-channeled enneagraphic labyrinthine horoscope for today: Something really nice might happen to you today, but don't bet on it."
I am all packed and ready to go! I've signed the contract with Moody and it looks like the first Pearl Girls™ book will be released in 2010. God is good! I look forward to sharing the good news with everyone at the Tea, seeing old friends, and meeting new ones.
Certainly we are due for an explosion in this event. We first saw the 44 second barrier broken back in 1968 as Lee Evans lowered the WR to 43.86 in Mexico City. Unfortunately we had to wait 20 years to see the 44 second barrier breached once again as Butch Reynolds lowered the WR to 43.29 and 19 year old Steve Lewis won Olympic gold with his WJR 43.87! These two were followed over the next few seasons by Danny Everett (43.81), Quincy Watts (43.50) and Michael Johnson himself, before another 13 year drought saw first Wariner and then Merritt joined the ranks of the 43 second quarter milers.
planetary in death,
But I am back with a layout to share with you.
-Maybe she can’t remember when I was born ….(ok a bit far-fetched but possible)
What do you think? If you want to pick up a bottle or check out the rest of the polishes in this line, you need to hop onto Pam's Facebook page. To order, you need to e-mail her at pea422000@yahoo.com. It will take a little while to hear back from her, she is swamped in orders right now but she will respond.
Welcome to Bonggamom's Friday Finds! I'm glad so many of you are finding this to be a useful way to get more traffic to your giveaways. And as a person who loves entering giveaways, I have to admit it's a great, easy way to find out where all the best giveaways are.
Parts of the ground were still covered in snow, some were down to just the soil and pine needle blanket. When a deer is fleeing, there can be up to 8-10 feet between tracks. Coyotes rarely leave tracks. Unless it’s in fresh mud.
Is it possible to get a freelance or staff writing job or even manager from just a Sitcom Pilot script? As opposed to doing a traditional Spec script? Of course we are assuming here the script is good and can be placed in the right hands. Or does one really have to have one of each?
(workday passes)
When the IDF unit managed to stop the bus, Mughrabi and her gang began shooting the helpless men, women and children at point-blank range and then firebombed the bus itself, turning it into a death trap. At least 35 were killed, including 13 children and a number of Americans.
Katarina Witt
The week's highlight was an Austin area young writers' event...
“Trying to understand is like straining through muddy water. Be still and allow the mud to settle.” - Lao Tzu
The underwear were merely a symbol for the body. The location of the most disgusting form of abjection. I chose the underwear for the location. I buy used underwear. Everyone says they don’t do it. I mean, I check the crotch and make sure it’s not stained, and only if they are like really cool or interesting. And of course I wash them before I wear them. A friend lost my favorite pair of crotch-less panties while performing in the Miss L.E.S. Pageant. Can’t blame her for that. I got them from a Saver’s in Springfield. Now used crotch- less panties no worries. They were low-cut, black lace, from the 70s."-K8 Hardy
priced at $95.00, is an all-in-one protective, soothing and youthifying eye treatment. The latest weapon against tired, aging eyes, YOUTHIFEYE is ideal for AGING, SENSITIVE and ACNE skin types. It helps instantly lift and revitalize the look of tired eyes and minimizes dark circles and under-eye puffiness. It even creates the appearance of fewer fine lines and crow’s feet.
I was especially excited as I love all things Amy Butler and the fact that this is an organic yarn, so much the better. I had looked at the wonderful colours on-line, and liked the fact that it is an aran weight, so it would be perfect for big projects like a blanket. It's 50% cotton, 50% wool blend, and you get around 90m in a 50g ball.
This year I started thinking of Christmas gifts earlier (not to early though) and I am planning to give only handmade gifts. I have a few ideas so as soon as I finish them I will post them here. Maybe you will get inspired and find some good ideas.
I am almost 2 weeks behind on this post...story of my life!!!
I’ve been house sitting for friends while they’re away on an exotic beach somewhere. The conversations with their dog and cat have been interesting, so I thought I’d share:
then took a wet paper towel and removed it-
In addition, on May 19 and May 20, Kim Junsu will kick off his solo concert tour in Seoul before moving on to Thailand and a total of six cities in Asia for his first Asia tour.
*Contact your favorite cable stations online to receive an advance schedule of programs. Then you can circle the ones that suit your studies, add them to your calendar, and be sure not to miss them. Channels such as HIST, TLC, DISC, LRN, and PBS will often have very informative shows (documentaries about the Pyramids or Robert E. Lee, Bill Nye the Science Guy, etc.)...just be aware of what point of view the topic is being approached from.
Pedestrian safety on Governor's Road, where a 15-year-old Highland student was hit by a car last week, is a community issue and not a school issue, Highland principal Kathy Starodub said this week.
So I really wanted to write a post-holidays post on the really cool books that I received this year, but instead, I'm gonna talk about the books that I'm excited about - the books I can't wait to read.
And there are several now.
And what are they thinking? Here are just a few examples: You’re gross/weird if you breastfeed past twelve months. You’re awful if you choose to work. You’re stupid if you choose to stay home. You’re endangering your child if you co-sleep. You’re the spawn of Satan if you let your little one cry it out. You’re a criminal if you give your kid Similac, which is akin to nothing less than rat poison. (You think that’s hyperbole, but Google “formula and rat poison” and check out the absolutely psychotic commentary that exists out there.)
My geraniums and African Marogolds will need potted into their final pots this weekend too, so if the weather picks up again after this week's atrocious conditions, things should start to fly - which is what my tunnel cover would be doing if I hadn't got to it in time!
This is one of those books that I had heard good things about on Twitter before I started to read it. Everything I saw suggested that this was going to be a gripping debut psychological thriller.
Maybe, I’ll take all my unfinished works and compile them into a series of short stories. I have enough to fill several books. Or, maybe I’ll start completely over and see if the black cloud will dissipate and let the writing sun shine down on me once again.
This body of work is lovingly dedicated to the memory of Urias Gabriel and Rachel 'Moon' Fulmer-Winkelman.
Utah synth-pop band scores Hot 100 hit and love from the Killers
4. They find patsies that include schoolchildren, disabled people, and organized labor and make them pay the price.
At the VERY beginning, I liked the changes to my body during pregnancy, i.e. bigger boobs!! ;) But, then, for the first trimester of my pregnancy, I was exhausted. I barely made it home from work without falling asleep. I had no energy. I stopped working out completely. I gained weight- fast. I remember one of my early prenatal visits and when the nurse lifted up my shirt to examine me, she kinda laughed and said, “you’re already wearing maternity jeans?” Yes, ma’am- my regular pants already didn’t fit.
I wrote a letter today for my wonderful husband and his 3 intrepid mates. They are trying to raise funds for their epic trip to Lake Bolsena, Italy to compete against able-bodied anglers in the World Carp Classic competition, over 6 days and 5 nights…
I remember this inconvenient moment of clarity that I had in law school. It was during on-campus interviewing season, which, by the way, is grueling. If you earn yourself a spot in the top x% of your class, you get the privilege of going on 20-50 interviews in one or two week’s time. Going through that process teaches you a lot about a lot of things. For me, the sheer exhaustion led to a moment of clarity, which unfortunately came in the middle of an interview.
In the weeks and months after Bloody Sunday, many young men and women from Derry joined the IRA, incensed by the massacre carried out by the British army’s parachute regiment.
For 'The Ashes' which are cricket's greatest prize.
Here´s Christy! She´s so cuuuute!
** by “paid” we mean with beer, and “actor” is actually a code word for street hobo***
I paired him up with the petite pages from Webster's pages. For a finishing touch I added flowers from Prima and a metal foliage piece from Tim Holtz.
There are two programs that are designed for us front line guys, although U S based the concepts and training apply to us in Canada as well.
the most versatile item in your back to school closet will be your jeans, we all have a pair that we love. jeans are a MUST have and bell bottom or flared jeans are great this season in dark blue or medium greys with slouchy dressy tops, over the shoulder is great for this look or just oversized. this is probably what most of you will be wearing when you go back to school.
Figure out who your audience is. Good luck!
Of course there could be people that are really inquisitive about a certain service or product and naturally that’s a different situation perhaps they really do need a once per month supply of acne cream! But this is an internet marketing scheme which fundamentally bribes you into completing an offer and then tells you can cancel it right afterwards the company whose product it is, is getting cheated.
I just came back from 2 long weeks of holidays in Paris. The weather was horrible most of the time, but I still enjoyed my stay a lot: Spending time with my family, meeting friends, shopping, knitting, reading, cooking.... These two weeks were really fun and I have a lot to show you.
Life has been busy over here. And I've UTTERLY sucked at keeping up with the blog. Obviously.
The origins of this celebration are connected to agricultural notions of time based on the moon. The previous New Moon before Wesak is the Sun and Moon annual rendezvous in the earth sign of Taurus.
Second, everyone else accepts this article on faith, save for quite a few savvy commenters way down the list of 150+ comments on the original piece.
you’re a fan of the Twilight Saga books by Stephanie Meyer or the movies starring Rob Pattinson and Kristen Stewart there is no doubt that the movie wedding scene in the most recent installment, Breaking Dawn Pt. 1, was romantic and beautiful. Set in a lush forest, the look was created by noted event
On boxing day my pseudo parents came into my room and told me that they’d finally decided what was best for me. I was to be sent to a home in the country. It sounded nice.
The water is still and turquoise, darkening with the fading light. No children frolic here at evening as Archorid begins to rouse, watching, waiting, fixed with jaws now closed. Arilla lays the child beneath the killing tree. This is now his sacred place where his spirit can be free to swing and sway. This is where his life began, this is where it will continue. This is where they'll share their souls since all things are connected.
1.Tomato : 5 large
Conclusion- Lockout achieves what it sets out to do and little else, but if you’re looking for an undemanding action movie with a neat idea behind it, this will do quite nicely. It’s not one of Luc Besson’s better movies, but it’s not a bad movie either. It’s mainly meant to function as sort of a love letter to cheesily enjoyable action movies, or at least, I’d like to think so. There’s nothing really done with the sci-fi hook other than placing a supermax prison in space for want of providing that extra bit of challenge for our protaganists, but what Lockout aims to be first and foremost is a cheeky action movie. Of course, the filmmakers were forced to stretch the runtime with dangling plot threads and forced contrivances that go nowhere, including when characters blatantly make stupid decisions for want of artificially lengthening the movie. Seriously, the conflict could have been resolved, and the movie concluded in several early spots, but the script keeps finding increasingly outlandish reasons to keep the two on MS:1 together, and while it may be part of the in-joke, it does sometimes feel a bit forced. On the bright side though, that means that you can spend more time enjoying Guy Pearce making wisecracks and Maggie Grace coming into her own as a valid supporting character in an action movie. I hope that she gets a bit of a chance to keep up this increased resourcefulness in Taken 2 this October, not merely being relegated to a plot device, but I guess I’ll have to wait and see. For now though, Lockout is a passable Besson effort that appeals to the man’s strengths as a writer and filmmaker, and that’s about all that you can ask from it. The limited budget and small scale may not fully capitalize on the idea with enough innovation if you’re the demanding type, but if you want to look at the glass half-full, Lockout doesn’t really botch anything either. It just sometimes feels hamstrung by its limited resources and forced filmmaking mandates. This is a movie that you really need to take for what it is, not what you think it should be. For what it is, it’s a fun, albeit fleeting good time for undemanding action fans who just want something to entertain them. If you want your movies to be a little more ambitious, then there’s no need to worry, because the Summer calendar is right around the corner. I guess Lockout’s appeal is a tad on the limited side, but that certainly doesn’t make it a sub-par product in the right light. If you have a soft spot for cheesy action films that are just there to show you a good time, proudly disposable and proudly sticking to the playbook, Lockout is worth checking out. If nothing else, it’s further proof that a miniscule budget doesn’t have to make your sci-fi movie unwatchable.
Be not blindfolded,you can begin a long lasting relationshi with your Creator today by accepting Jesus as your Lord and Saviour.I will recommend this to you:ask this question directly from your Creator,”Lord,what do you want me to do?”
forevermore.
The key thing is to recognize you made a mistake and try to make progress.
Somehow without a sound, I heard Him call my name.
Every fabric is different - it depends on the looseness of the weave and heaviness of the cloth as well as the weave. Satins like the ones recommended above are usually ok, but there can be some distortion of the side seams and I will show you how to deal with this as we sew - don't worry, it's easy! I used to design a lot of bias georgette dresses and I'd determine this adaptation during pre-production, but for one-offs it is easier to do it as we sew.
Baby Charlie's room is Monkey/Jungle themed, so we decided to have a Jungle themed baby shower. Here are a few of the details:
Who exactly is Olivia in cahoots with? I bet it’s either going to be Catherine or Bodaway or maybe even the real Siobhan? It can only be one of those three, right?
INTUITIVE AND POWERFUL
I know, sometimes getting the message for me is about as slow as walking to the road to get the mail. Truthfully, we really do compliment each other pretty well, but that means my strengths are her weakness and vice-versa. It's kind of like a John Deere livin' with a Farmall... we're both interested in getting the field plowed, but we sometimes both think we have the best way to do it. Now we could just always go with the right way... er, I mean my way... but that could result in me sleeping in the dog house... or barn... and it's cold out there these days.
A moment of life springs forth; with each passing moment...as we see Spring bringing forth new life.
20 And the watchman told, saying, He came even unto them, and cometh not again: and the driving is like the driving of Jehu the son of Nimshi; for he driveth furiously.
I met Andrew in the summer of 1998 when we were both trail guides at a camp in the Boundary Waters in northern Minnesota. Don’t worry, I’m not going to tell you the whole long story of our meeting, falling in love, and getting married, but the setting to that story is important to the one I’m about to tell, so a few details need to be shared.
the slightly twisted and totally insane.
UGH….it’s all okay and I’m totally okay. It just seems to be impossible to find someone with everything. And of course, it is. Somewhere down the line if I want to be with someone again, I’m going to have to make sacrifices. And it will be up to me to decide what they are, because no one is perfect. And I highly doubt that anyone will even be “perfect for me.”
3. In a blender, puree strawberries in syrup with a bit of water.
Dirty Dave being a seasoned professional performed the arm-cow-jacksy procedure without the benefit of the shoulder length glove.Following which he plunged his hand into the deep reaches of his overall pocket,producing a half eaten Terry's Chocolate Orange,greedily breaking a piece off and eating, prior to offering around,
The sun is warm at Blaye;
I note that noise canceling headsets I have tried seem to eliminate noise at the expense of quality sound so I figured on owning two headsets.
hereafter, and are content to believe things which they do not understand.
Dinosaurs attacking...
By the way, for those playing at home, the difference in percentage terms between 425 and 419 is actually 1.5. I didn’t work that out myself, I just read the rest of the story now and it was down near the end of the article.
Former World Bank economist William Easterly agrees. His new book, "The White Man's Burden," argues that Western efforts to cure poverty in the rest of the world have done more harm than good.
in the cellar say she plans to stay awhile.
this is day 121 of my third year in pictures…
“Unfortunately, for the past several weeks, Republican House members have essentially said that the only way they’ll vote to prevent America’s first-ever default is if the rest of us agree to their deep, spending cuts-only approach,” Obama said. “If that happens, and we default, we would not have enough money to pay all of our bills — bills that include monthly Social Security checks, veterans’ benefits and the government contracts we’ve signed with thousands of businesses.”
On Friday it’s pandemonium on the Foreign Bar. There’s a constant stream of punters asking for fruit beers. Most of our draught beers are Dutch and Belgian blondes and proper lager from Germany, along with the dedicated Czech Bernard fonts. But there are a few kegs of Boon Kriek. On Friday night we put one of those on. It’s gone in twenty-five minutes. Worse than that, it causes absolute gridlock because all the staff are now queueing to pour kriek instead of serving customers. In the queue we’re brainstorming how to handle this better next year.
The next song is Jesus Walks, by Kanye West. He’s going to be on here again so watch out. He might be crazy, he might be conniving, he might be what all his critics say he is, but no matter what is said boy can make music. Ho-ly SHIT he can make music I want to DANCE to, so I have to listen, I have to wiggle, and if every once in awhile the word Jesus slips through these lips without the word “fuck” included, it would only be because I’m singing this song. My favorite line? ‘’Next time I’m in the club everyone screaming out (Jesus walks)”. Be up front about your manipulations! Hells to the yes, save all us sinners Kanye!! What can I say? I’m amused. Also, while finding this song I saw he has a video out with a bunch of ballerinas in it so that’s where I’m headed next, rap AND ballet? HEAVEN.
I spend a lot of my time over-analysing things. I've always been the same. I think far too much about what might be or what if etc. I worry about being a good parent far too much. Sometimes it's nice to just dream about things though with no hidden anxiety and that's exactly what I've been doing about stepping back into the adoption process. Dreaming of what might become. Dreaming of changing nappies again; dreaming of a little girl sleeping in her bedroom in her cot; dreaming of a new buggy (one that I actually want this time rather than the hasty purchase we had to make last time); dreaming of those moments of first meeting and of forming a bond; dreaming of those words "you've been matched"; dreaming of creating her bedroom; dreaming of her calling us Mummy and Daddy; dreaming of her saying "I love you" for the first time; dreaming of all the possibilities. All the positives; all the wonderful stuff that being a parent is all about.
The struggles I’m facing,
Vinay: Put your heart & soul into your essay!
The boys loved playing on the blow up mattress that my sister slept on. Their favorite thing now is jumping. They jump on the couch, beds, etc. I let them jump on my bed the other day. They kept falling down on the bed and laughing so hard. It's so cute.
4 - GE Appliance Giveaway. Put your blogging skills to the test to win a $5000 appliance from GE! Your entry is a submitted blog post on one of their five topics. Visit GE for details before December 30th!
The esoteric presence of the number 108 can be seen in various spiritual practices and theories: In Kriya Yoga, the maximum number of repetitions allowed to be practiced in one sitting is 108. Also, 108 Sun Salutations in yoga practice is often used to honor change, for example the change of seasons, or at a time of tragedy to bring peace, respect and understanding. It is said that if one can be so calm in meditation practicing pranayama to have only 108 breaths a day that enlightenment will come.
The posters themselves are spectacular. I've always had it my mind to take a picture of the "Lords of Flatbush" poster. The posters are all Brooklyn centric obviously, but what makes them utterly magical to me is the references they make to the Brooklyn Dodgers. They are more footprints in the dried-up river bed. The posters are more little fossils of evidence which proves the Brooklyn Dodgers are alive and well in the Borough of Kings.
"Nobody can make you feel inferior without your permission." -Eleanor Roosevelt
My Pen name is S.G.A.B
d. An album by a Swiss band
Not gonna lie, the KEM application process was grueling, stressful, and at times excruciating. But when I got to the other side of it, I ended up not only with the right to call myself a KEMer (and with that name came a lot of positive synonyms), but also with more confidence in myself and loads of new experiences. It was like I can deal with almost anything thrown my way (insert dealwithit.gif).
Go on, then; there are other worlds than these.
Free at the point of use it maybe, but cost free it certainly isn't. The cost to all us tax payers runs to over £100 billion a year. It has the income of a small nation but with the burden of expectations of a very large, complex and demanding one. As multiple reports over the years prove (including this one), the NHS is neither efficient or effective in delivering the standard of care we expect. As someone who has had a love one almost die of malnutrition on an NHS ward, I know for a fact that reform is needed.
Now when I gave the names of Beery, Newman, DeNiro and Stallone, understand that they are the best-recognized stars of this genre. There are other actors out there who have strapped on their padded gloves and kissed the canvas. Fred Williamson, Marlon Brando, Montgomery Clift, Brad Davis, Jon Voight, Mr. T, Dolph Lundgren, Carl Weathers and Tim Conway... all have spent time in the square circle.
Making more matzah balls - the mixture is messy and delicious.
Extremely simple
Finally, could it just be that both stories are utter nonsense, in which case why not just drop the entire 'tale' and re-brand the beer properly, instead of quietly changing supposed 'facts' hoping nobody notices?
At the heart of this concept was the medium wheeled armoured personnel carrier, Dannatt's preferred type being the Piranha, the acquisition of which he regarded as so important that he was prepared to forego mine protected vehicles in Iraq and Afghanistan.
A report released yesterday by Princeton University and the Brookings Institution found that the top five chronic childhood conditions that limit typical activities are some type of developmental, behavioral or mental problem.
(4) Trim off the right-hand side margin from page 2.
The Knight of Sainte-Hermine (Le Chevalier de Sainte-Hermine, 1869): This nearly completed novel was his last major work and was lost until its rediscovery by Claude Schopp in 1988 and subsequent release in 2005.
After scores of visits to the Metropolitan Museum I still marvel that I’m allowed stand within sniffing distance of Van Gogh’s Starry Night; however, if the sheer profusion of masterpieces becomes too much for you, then surrender yourself to the moody serenity of a Vermeer at the more negotiable Frick Museum.
The word "photograph" literally translated from the greek, means "draw with light".
When I started teaching my own kids, I never allowed them to say that they hated math or the math was hard. When ever they expressed frustration with math, I would tell them that they just needed to be more familiar with whatever it was that we were working on. Now when they come to something challenging they actually dive in and try to see it in as many different ways as they can until they feel comfortable.
Who would remember you, i will not forgive it
extremely natural to them. and then you either never get back
Daniel looks about the empty parking lot, parks his truck, pulls a small metal box from under the seat, leaves his vehicle, scurries over to the opponent’s car, and with three small thrusts of a sharp silver tool flattens the opponent’s car tires, leaving one tire fully inflated. He slips the tool into his gym bag, takes a deep breath, and softly whistles a tune. As he strolls straight towards the playing field his feet barely touch the ground. There was nothing neighbourly about this game.
Corinne
There’s a real combination of styles here, but the ornate wooden console table really comes into its own set against such a neutral background.
It seems like a LOT of basil, and it really is – but it’s not too much. I adore fresh basil.
Wishing you a very happy week and thank you for popping in. Take care of yourselves, Annette x
Have you ever eaten something and you just knew it was good for you. It looked pretty good, definitely tasted good, you didn’t feel all gross and stuffed afterwards?
your eyes all watery,
...why I don't like creating scrapbooks - IT TAKES FOREVER. This is a mini scrapbook made from one piece of 12x12 Desiger Series Paper and the finished size is 3x6 closed. The scrapbook itself only takes minutes, me deciding how to decorate it took about three hours.
“The co-operative factories of the labourers themselves represent within the old form the first sprouts of the new, although they naturally reproduce, and must reproduce, everywhere in their actual organisation all the shortcomings of the prevailing system. But the antithesis between capital and labour is overcome within them, if at first only by way of making the associated labourers into their own capitalist, i.e., by enabling them to use the means of production for the employment of their own labour. They show how a new mode of production naturally grows out of an old one, when the development of the material forces of production and of the corresponding forms of social production have reached a particular stage. Without the factory system arising out of the capitalist mode of production there could have been no co-operative factories. Nor could these have developed without the credit system arising out of the same mode of production. The credit system is not only the principal basis for the gradual transformation of capitalist private enterprises. into capitalist stock companies, but equally offers the means for the gradual extension of co-operative enterprises on a more or less national scale. The capitalist stock companies, as much as the co-operative factories, should be considered as transitional forms from the capitalist mode of production to the associated one, with the only distinction that the antagonism is resolved negatively in the one and positively in the other.”
I certainly remember the pre-pushing part of labor better this time around. I was very uncomfortable, and did a fair share of vomiting and getting too hot and needing water. I changed my position a lot, and I was really confused because the doctor had said to let him know if I felt the urge to push and I was feeling the urge to push, but I didn’t feel like anyone cared. I felt like I’d had a lot of instruction on what to do and how to do it when I was in labor with Evelyn and this time everyone seemed to be waiting on me to make the decisions and I didn’t want to and I didn’t know what to do!
(Jack) Are there any current projects you wish to share?
Here it is, a 100% vegan and gluten free cake that is moist beyond belief, warms the soul and makes you eat two extra servings of vegetables during dessert! Gluten free or not, get ready to inhale some delicious cake, without the sin!
I started posting on every query board, forum or anything else involved with adoption. I searched sites for anybody who might be looking for me. Sometimes I would on the web for days and then I would get frustrated and then didn’t go near the pc for weeks.
“I’ll be waiting at the gates of heaven for you. I hope the rest of you make it there as well. I’m ready.”
First game against an Absylonia list. Beautiful models. We tied. No, really, we tied the untieable game. We tied on every damn tiebreaker, all 4 of them and also the army points (eVlad and Absylonia both had +5 jackbeast points) so a roll of some dice just put me over my opponent for next round’s matchups purposes.
And then I realized the "kind of ugly" girl was the guy. We forgive guys for having a bit of a double chin. And why? Really, why is there a double standard for men and women?
That she hopes you find the water in your search – but hopes that you don’t jump off a cliff to find it. She knows that’s exactly what you plan to do.
As our regular reader will know, it’s our belief that regardless of strategy, creativity and the creative crafts ultimately make the difference between great advertising and not-so-great advertising. And none more so than great writing. Regardless of media or technology, great writing is still the most powerful tool available to the marketer and advertiser. So we've been asking people whose opinions we respect to tell us their favourite three pieces of advertising writing. And thankfully most of them didn't tell us to fuck off. We’re running them as an irregular series. Today's is number eight, with selections from the inimitable ad-man, mad-mad and author of books George Parker (George has a new book out, more on that at the bottom of the post)...
for Oswin Nigel Rupert or Piers
Mike: If you wore your glasses more often, you’d find they do not look the same.
Ponce Corps
Laurent Debout, Renault Sport F1 team support leader: There is nothing else to say but a huge congratulations to Pastor and the entire Williams team. Pastor drove a fantastic race to score his first win in F1, fully deserved. We are really proud to have contributed to helping the team score its first win since 2004 and the first Williams-Renault win since the 1997 season. What a feeling to deliver on the speed and performance we have shown since the start of the year.
to fill the spaces
“This same grace will ultimately be our only basis for eternal fellowship with God in the life to come…We can be sure every one of God’s people who will worship and serve Him throughout eternity will be there for only one reason—because they were recipients of grace—God’s love freely given to the undeserving and the unworthy. There is no other basis for entrance into the kingdom of God—here on earth or in heaven.” (199)
Musical instruments
Captions for the New Yorker contest are due tonight by midnight.
My article previewing the production last week was based on a wide-ranging interview with Sergio Morabito, one of its duo of directors, and revival director Samantha Seymour. I thought it might be interesting, in the light of all this fuss, to revisit the original transcript for more detail. It's longish, and Sergio's English is quite Germanic, so get yourself a cuppa...
a mighty fountain momently was forced,
The street has such an innocuous and typical Dutch name that even I forgot it several times when trying to find the place. I’m going to keep it a secret, as it was for me a precious gift from a close friend. But on this street, at any time of day in any season of year, a person can so easily forget that they’re in a major city and convince themselves that they’re in Cornwall or Luxembourg in some small town, miles from anywhere.
Let`s be honest, a Miyagikyou/Iichiko combination is a bit of a half-assed sort of a blend but I think I will be able to take this experiment a lot further. It at least proved to me that there is nothing in the nature of whiskies and shochus to preclude such mixtures. But what about a bit more oomph in the malt? And a lot more power in the shochu? We could leave the barley shochu shores and stick in a shlick of lengthily aged rice-based awamori? Or a heavily peated malt with a drop of stinking potato shochu. Nice! Or maybe not?
She knew she wasn’t quite fair on the opinions she accumulated on the immortal youth and its blatant contempt for those on the short waiting list with nothing but dust to offer. She tried to blame them for at least not appreciating the accomplishment of not dying but youth and beauty live in the distant shadow of the end and being reminded of the impending wind isn't pleasant. So off with the reminders of morality and toss their walkers and comfortable clothes away too! Who wants to be reminded of death? For Mattie it wasn't so much the problem of death and begin dead but waiting to die. She had made all of her life time mistakes and had her days, she was ready for it to finally just be done with it and often her heart made a troubling stab at her chest and she new her time wasn't long. The part of her life constructed in mistake and loneliness finally would be wiped away and perhaps she would go to sleep and wake up with Greta as pretty as the day they met. Often Mattie just woke a little
The candy consists of products from Creative Memories which you know is primarily a SBing company.
These photos don’t seem to look anything like the person we know from the inside. And it only takes one or 2 bad snapshots (or ID card photos) for us to not want to have to deal with the whole range of emotions looking at our faces stir up.
No ceasefire will stop these terrorists while they are getting paid to kill. Tuesday evening they planted bombs to kill innocent people and the armed forces in Aleppo.
3. One Meat Ball
I fall in love with someone or something in this city at least once a day. I've never experienced that before I moved here. And I wouldn't give that experience up for anything.
LawHawk: “What is truly galling is that the Democrats in Congress, along with the President, are trying to stoke populist anger against AIG and other corporations, all while skirting the truth that it was Congress itself that was responsible for this mess – the bailouts along with the allowances for executive compensation. If there is anger, it should be directed at the President and Congress, both of which knew that this executive compensation was to be paid.”
a game table. 2 walls of windows for the game table. What's not to like?
Pick and wash millet, cook thick porridge, let it cool and rub through a sieve.
"In order to test the temperature of your oil, throw a few ice cubes in."If you don't have any experience with hot oil, this is where things could go bad. Throwing ice cubes into oil will cause them to turn instantly to steam, causing an explosion and sending skin-searing oil all over your body. Third degree burns are fun!
1/2 c all-purpose flour
1 8 ounce package of cream cheese (softened)
I have been asked about a billion times, lately how i coordinate games, behavior, tv time,etc while doing child led learning.
I did not think anything more about it until two days later when I was cleaning Abby's room and read the first sentence of her paper: "For three generations there have been no natural births in our family."
“IUOE union bosses believe one set of rules should apply to them while the workers who are forced to accept their so-called ‘representation’ are essentially told to shut up and stay out of the way,” said Mark Mix, President of the National Right to Work Foundation. “Fortunately, these courageous workers are dedicated to protecting their rights in the face of rank union boss hypocrisy.”
After that Brother Alembrihan asked her and her family to come to the church. They would stay three days in the church to allow the brother Alembrihan and the elders to pray over the woman so that the demons could not come back and bother her any more.
Whether you want to improve your love life or your social life, study these body language techniques so you are sure you set the right tone in any social setting.
I have written two novels—well, one is technically a manuscript and the other has been published by PublishAmerica (which I seriously DO NOT recommend). My questions pertain to that of my manuscript. You see, I submitted it to the New York Literary Agency almost a year ago, knowing that a sale was not guaranteed or that being a new author. Now, after a year, I feel that my manuscript is just sitting there, idling because my agent is unable to be bothered by it. I get a monthly report in a form letter saying "...this is a normal progression of a manuscript in our care...do not get discouraged..." And I can't help but wonder if another agency would be better suited to handle my manuscript and other future works. I am in serious need some advice on the subject.
Favorite series?
showing off his reading, spelling, & counting skills!
Oh weekend, why must you arrive so slowly?
Another personal highlight of mine would be the fact that:
By Maureen Ryan
This year, however, I found myself at least paying attention to some of the sale prices in stores, and I have to say that it looks like there are some terrific bargains out there. Maybe one of these days when I am rolling in more moolah, I shall brave the crowds to try Les Soldes out. It looks there are some great deals on winter coats and boots, various housewares and household items, not to mention clothing.
I was the girl in the twisty pig-tails with her nose stuck in a book while the other kids played on the jungle gym; the one who actually took pride in raising my hand in class and knowing the right answer. I was the girl who would really rather go home and play with my brother's Masters of the Universe and Star Wars action figures than go out and play Barbie or Cabbage Patch dolls with the girls down the block. And I was probably the only girl on that block who couldn't decide who she wanted to date more: Han Solo, Gambit or Starbuck. (What? I like the bad boys, so sue me. I totally had a thing for Wesley Crusher, too, if that helps.)
The scriest of all zombies are the retro zombies. They spread out fast and have a mean chompy bite.
Right now I'm curled up on my couch in my apartment watching married with children on TV while my roommate lucy struggles with filling out a million job applications. I used to hate the 90s, yes I've been mean muggin since '93, but I always thought of it as one of the least inspirational decades. Looking at the 2000 and actually looking back at my childhood, they weren't so bad.
The Lancastrians wore a red rose, the Yorkists wore the white. The war over which great family was to hold the crown of England lasted from 1455, to 1487... and is known in history as
I believe if we ask God he will see the desires of our hearts. He wants us to be happy and live a life full of peace, love, and Joy. It's just that he can see the whole picture and we can't. That means he always knows what best for us even if its not our dream!
‘What’?
Take a needle and length of wool, and starting from one end, curl the french knitting into a circle and continue to stitch the coils together till you get to the end. Hide the tail end of the wool in the mat.
Rocky's favorite books are the Diary of a Wimpy Kid series of "graphic" novels. I have to say this is genious! Simple, fun "kid's life" stories with doodle-style cartoons to illustrate the most serious or funniest moments. Last year, when the movie came out, Rocky and I had a "date" and went to see it. It was way funnier than I thought it would be. This year, they came out with a sequel, and you know we'll have to go see it!
Today, after airing one of his famous bear updates (about an Altadema, California, momma bear and her two cubs in a tree), Shep remarked, “Aw, look at ‘em. You know what they need! They need those bears a trampoline.”* When someone seemed to chuckle softly off-camera, Shep added, “Get ‘em right out of there and put them on a trampoline. They have a nice little ride.” As long-time viewers, doubtlessly, awaited the Trampoline Bear video to run as usual, Shep sadly intoned, “Can’t show that anymore, though! Apologies.”
And at the same time, I'm plotting my return voyage to Vancouver, which is trees as thick as houses and jagged mountains and laburnum and raspberries growing like weeds. I like me a good mountain range.
Just found out that teifidancer has become a grandad/tadcu....... the world can sometimes feel like a shitty place, but at the moment I feel like dancing...... so off to wet the nippers head....... I have years ahead now off telling the nipper of my dreams of another world, but that can wait for a while....... will be back soon.......
a Balmain jacket
I will readily admit that, at times I become so spellbound by the little hidden beauties Córdoba has to offer, I often find myself feeling like a tourist in my own city! It´s main allure, well for me anyway, is that you can completely lose yourself in its labyrinth of narrow streets which are suffused with the sweet smell of oranges and, especially at this time of year, the distinctive aroma of flowers. These maze-like streets are framed by ever so charming time-worn buildings which, I´m sure, if their walls could talk would have a lot of tales to tell! You could honestly spend hours, believe me I have, wandering through these quaint little streets soaking up the history that continues to unfold with each new turn you take. It honestly is magical.
Who Will Save The World? The Mighty Groundhogs! (1972)
Finally, the founding father's believed that gun ownership was necessary for a country to truly be free. If the government distrusted the people so much as to disarm them, then that government no longer truly represented the people. In other words, in our structure of government, the power is supposed to lie in the hands of the people. How would it make sense for that government, of the people, to take away the most effective means of self defense from those people? ''
But as a single person just looking for love, do I need to concern myself with things like children? Should I preoccupy myself with such far-off dreams? Is there any good that can come out of this, or am I just setting myself up for disappointment?
"Please, Lord, comfort her and let her know that You are there".
~ Still no consensus on how "orgeat" is pronounced.
TEE SIEW KIONG is MCA National Organising Secretary
Location: Quezon City
16. Nur im Traum (Piano-Version)
1- Pray
Me: “Well,” (looking down at the bottom of my boat), “I guess it’s a little damp from the drops of water splashed into it from the paddle, but I mean, not really. You?”
Sometimes it can be helpful to file evidence or an expert declaration during examination. These can be persuasive in showing Examiners the expectations of the skilled person at the priority date. Given that negative results rarely get published, it can be difficult to show through published documents that in a particular field there would have been no expectation of a certain approach succeeding.
I’d like to thank you, your wife, and all the other teachers who share their gifting and talents. Most of the ideas I use that work in my classroom were borrowed from other teachers who have shared what’s worked for them. The songs you (and others) write for children help and inspire me to keep doing what I love.
The main idea behind Clooney’s Satellite Sentinel Project is, “If you know your actions are going to be covered, you tend to behave much differently than when you operate in a vacuum.” It’s about accountability.
“Someone wants Sunny to be left alone, dead. Or, as I think it is now, killed. We need to find someone else who was with her that morning. And we need to be there before the next kill. Oh yes, there are going to be more,” answered Karan to a horrified Jeremy. This was not what Jem had expected when Karan had come to him with his plan. But he wasn’t backing out.
The exemption for performers ... would make Wales a more attractive place for programme making and would remove current costs involved with taking smoking scenes on productions being filmed in Wales to England. The smoking ban has been a major issue for a number of productions that have been filmed in Wales, especially period dramas set in a time when smoking was commonplace.
Then there’s the Aviary. A terrifying monsterpiece of a building, the Aviary is a gargantuan rectangular concrete block with narrow vertical slits for windows. This is where the town keeps its inexplicably large population of madmen. It’s also where the town gets rid of most of its dead. Bodies are dumped into holes at the base of the Aviary, where they’re dragged away and somehow made use of by the Aviary’s inhabitants. Again, this building has been sealed off since the outbreak, the inhabitants still inside.
When I realized this I tilted my head back and laughed, and said, Universe, pop quiz today? I smiled and picked up the phone to call a neighbor to see if they had a number for a good fridge guy.
There are things that I love about facebook, like reconnecting with my German-Italian niece who now lives in England and finding out about the lives of old friends that I lost track of decades ago.
And I still can't believe it
We have all become used to the news media trick, which Ann Coulter describes as “to lie by omission” most often used to describe a non-white crime suspect in a manner best illustrated by the picture above, or by the recent Daily Mail report on the race riots in US prisons where by the (deliberate?) failure to mention the words “black” or “Hispanic” the report leaves open the possibility that the racial violence was white on black. In fact, no whites were involved, but I wonder how many Mail readers realised that.
Take three or four small branches - with the greenery and all should be as thick as three or four fingers- and tie them together with dark green plastic covered metal wire.
6. Speakeasy Scarface Stout
6. Dallas Mavericks
Put the chicken wings back into the pot
1. Mark Green from Choc Fever
Come on! Who sends a girl who LIKES you a picture of you in the shirt that sent her to heaven for a second and goofy glasses. Just because she asked for it? No one should but he did! There is no chest I would rather lay on than his. The steady heartbeat beneath his amazing abs and those strong arms to keep me safe. Nope I am just a sad pathetic girl who simply tries and be normal and cries in her pillow under her bed, blogging at midnight to vent. Like seriously, I got issues.
I had such a lovely day with my hubby and kids. And they did all kinds of sweet things for me.
What do YOU think?!?!?!
Was the incorporation of two bars of "Kookaburra" into "Down Under" a cultural tribute to Australia, along with the inclusion in the video clip of references to Foster's, Vegemite, a kangaroo, a koala, a beach and a gum tree, and therefore sparing it from being a copyright infringement? Sadly for the defendant band, this didn't help. A copying was no less a copying where it was intended to create a cultural allusion.
These pics certainly aren't as popular on flickr as some of my other pics (not that any are outragreously popular), and I was surprised by that. Maybe he's right.
the brick crumbles
What a difference the right diagnosis, the right medication, and a year of breastmilk provided by generous, wonderful, sacrificial lactating moms makes,eh? And the people said AMEN!
Long entry, sorry!
Turn all the pies over and match them up according to sizes. On one side of a pie spread a nice amount of the Irish Cream Buttercream. I used about 2-3 tablespoons depending on the size of the pie. Don't be stingy now. On top of this add 1 teaspoon of the Irish Whiskey Ganache and then top with a second pie.
Yesterday was a busy day for me. I left at 7 to take my husband to work. He works 30 minutes away and since we only have one car, I will stay in town to do all my grocery shopping. I had a hamburger at lunch. Whoops, should have had a salad - I had gone four days doing totally raw. I'll continue with my raw for at least two meals though.
2. How would you spend today if you knew it was your last day to live?
What caught my eye about the book was the charming repetitiveness use of the rhyme, “Here’s a little baby, one two three, (an action a baby does during the day), what does he see?” The word Peepo! then comes under a cut-out circle in the middle of the following page, giving us a glimpse of what the baby sees, a view of what is about to come. The story begins when the baby wakes, and ends when he is put to bed. My daughter loved it every time I would lead up to saying Peepo, and to this day she remembers the little words scattered throughout the book like bear, dog, bath, etc.
It kept him quiet for ages......
Likewise, if your job is to teach a subject and students can show you on tests they know it even without doing every assignment, then their grades should reflect that mastery, not laziness.
Outstanding job ladies! Please display your Top Three badge (from the side of the blog) on your blogs with pride and watch for your cards to be featured in our slide show. If you would like to be a guest design team member for an upcoming challenge and get all the free digis from our sponsor to play with, just send me an email.
Most hilarious is the response from Roger Pielke, Jr, concerning the scientific credentials of his father, who was surprised to find himself on the list of skeptics:
But I'm off to bed now. I'll be seeing you soon!! Stay tuned for a sneak peek for a fun upcoming event...do I see a giveaway in the near future?? ;)...
I also vet the people I work with. If someone calls me from out of the blue and wants me to do work for or with them, I check them out. I do due diligence. So I may combine someone's name with various search terms to see if something comes out. (If you saw I had the name of a reputable person combined with odd search terms would you think I knew something bad?)
Happy week end to you !
In 1964, Sahm assembled a band and persuaded record producer Huey P. Meaux -- the "Crazy Cajun" -- to record them. Meaux named the band the "Sir Douglas Quintet," hoping to capitalize on the popularity of British invasion bands.
April 2 – Blessing of the Fleet 5K, Darien, GA 29:30
We departed Killarney to the north and made our way to the first stop which was Killorglin where we stopped for an Irish Coffee at 10 in the morning. It was here that we got our first taste of just how scenic this trip was going to be. The Red Fox is where we each got a cup of coffee, just a latte, not the Irish variety and across on the other side of the road was a cottage, along a stream, with the mountain behind it. The pictures below don’t do the scene justice but it was the first of many scenes that took my breath away this day.
Before Sunrise & Before Sunset
Time for a brain-teaser! So far I’ve made mini paintings with dictionary pages depicting the letters r, s, t and n. Can you guess which two letters will come next in this sequence? Hint: if you spend your sick days watching the game show network, you might have a leg up on this one.
Later at home I reviewed the photos and culled the ones that didn’t have useful information. I cut out a few of mine where I had my finger on the lens (whoops! I did say the tablet was more awkward for photos), a few of his where he took an interest in a grave decoration or the scenery generally, and occasional duplicates where one or the other of us tried to get a better shot. Between us we had a total of about 70 usable photos. Only 20 of them were mine!
The two youths quickly had the bulb in action, the anode red with the impact of the electron stream striking upon it.
and pleasure dimmed by longing.
Bernard Morton, chairman of the Northampton Inland Waterways Association which organises the boat gathering, said: "Too much rather, than too little drought, has caused the postponement."
Till next time, don’t forget the red ang pows!
In even more exciting news ...I saw my specialist yesterday and I can start some slow walking...15min every second day and build up to 35 mins in 3 weeks and then see him again. This is such great news as I can finally walk the girls to school again and take Oscar for a walk. Si life is getting there....and I am sure 22 kg down has only helped the foot situation
1/3 cup white-wine vinegar
However the long term trend in both S&P500 and Russell2000 is up. We are experiencing a short to medium term correction in a long term up market.
First paragraph:
Don’t you think it was bit egotistical of him to attempt to count when he could barely speak? It was terrible to watch.
How many times do we let our attitude get in the way of God’s purpose in our lives? Yes, the wind was contrary, but it was God Who was upholding all things by the word of His power.
You have 48 hours before I start contacting various places to submit breaches in our contract. You need to get in contact with me before than ... please understand I don't want to do this but you binding my hands.
I don't mean to push out 2011 since October just started but it is the end of the year for aaduna as a publication. The fall issue, which is our last issue of the year, is now available at http://www.aaduna.org/ and we are accepting submissions for the First Anniversary/winter 2012 issue scheduled for launch on February 28th. The submissions deadline is November 13 and more detailed information is available on the website.
Immigrant Nation
That is a very good question. I am not sure I know how to answer that. I never really grew up watching movies and thinking…wow, that’s what I want to do. My acting started as a freshman..so, about 13. A friend of mine was signing up for the beginning acting class and urged me to join him. I was really hesitant at first but he talked me into it. I tended to be a class clown in school so my father encouraged me to channel that energy into something other than cracking jokes in class. I remember the first play I ever auditioned for, ‘The Imaginary Invalid’. I ended up getting cast in a small role but…that feeling of opening night…the anticipation right before you step on stage….the energy in the room. There is nothing like it in the world and I got hooked. I have been acting ever since. Film and TV work came much later. I dabbled in a couple of low-budget productions but it wasn’t until I moved to LA that I truly became interested. Once I moved to Portland, I immediately got an agent and started auditioning for any project I could.
“Dan’s okay, “I said. “They didn’t have to take the days off and show us around.”
“So, once again you rejected Jonghyun?” Asked Taeyeon curiously as she’s lying on my bed.
I want a career where I can make a difference and where I have the feeling of making a difference. Living a green eco-friendly life has always appealed to me. I want to turn this interest into a career. I want to make a difference in our world, in our environment.
No, I got influenced a lot by other artistes. You know, we all get influenced, otherwise we will be so rigid. You must admire somebody and want to be like somebody. The only thing is don’t overdo it, because you can never be that somebody. At the end of the day, if you have learnt what you have to learn, come back and be yourself.
One of our doctor appointments this week was for me.
I've pinned sooo many cool things, found so many awesome projects and recipes. Unfortunately I don't usually have time (or motivation) to actually do a lot of the things I've pinned, but have gotten around to some of them.
I'll hopefully be returning to this subject tomorrow (what was that about there being no rhyme or reason to this week's posts? Yeah, I might've lied there; there's always a plan, no matter how half-arsed), but there's usually an exception to every rule, however rambling that rule may be, and the UK hardback of Started Early, Took My Dog is such an exception:
the examiner will be able to focus upon the more relevant information, and
To spice this activity up, we ate some Cinnabon Cereal my teammate picked up. They taste just like mini cinnamon rolls, with a little crunch! I seriously had to hide them from myself before the activity started because they would have been gone! :)
Rare in replaceable
Aventura Mall – Aventura, FL
Think about it. Think about walking down the street of your local town, and there on a street corner is a guy telling you things like, “God told me ______.” You’d think he was nuts. You’d tell him get help. You’d say to your buddy at church on Sunday, “why do people think that ambushing folks with the word of God is way to evangelize. Don’t they realize that stuff just makes people think we’re all crazy?”
That’s what I have been informed of this morning! We are very into colours at the moment.
6 No matter how you drew your hangman, do the following now: select the whole drawing with the Selection tool (V).
More key tips and thoughts to come.
You just set me free
the one that
What should you take away from this review?
Red Hot Fury is Kasey Mackenzie‘s debut novel. It’s an entry into urban fantasy with a slightly different spin: her lead character, Marissa Holloway, is a Fury (as in Greek mythology) who works in the mundane world as Boston’s Chief Magical Investigator.
So was it worth the wait? In truth, yes, but with caveats. In a nutshell, it starts well with the mid-tempo ‘Anna Lee’, rather loses its way in the middle and then picks up again towards the end. So 8/9 of the 12 songs are fine but the remaining few are a bit under whelming. Whilst this is undoubtedly a fine album, I can’t help missing the quirky and sombre-voiced contributions from bassist Michael Steele, who has retired from the music biz and does not appear on this album, the first not to feature her. The result is that the remaining three chop up song writing and vocal chores amongst them and each gets a bigger slice of the pie.
Thank You for your consideration xx :-)
My second enticing red was much more unlikely, and yet much more traditional in many ways. I really do like Portuguese wines and champion them whenever I can, but normally I seek out wines made from Portugal’s fascinating indigenous grape varieties. However the lovely people at Bacalhoa sent me their top red wine to try and I am so very glad they did as this superb Cabernet Sauvignon-Merlot blend from Portugal came as a wonderful surprise.
Better round second!
OK, it's a LONG post again, but you'll like it. And, it's a Christmas freebie, so it's worth it - LMBO!
We moved on, and clambering up a granite outcrop we stopped for a snack, our voices ringing out, incompatible with the bush, carrying over the miles, probably scaring every animal away.
so when we got back to the ship we had another massage.
Band of Brides does not have the patience to wait for tomorrow! Band of Brides is already a part of the future! Band of Brides will straight out start with the dessert!
Stimulate Your Senses
Months after the trial, Ally sees Robyn with the man who caused the accident that led to Robyn’s lawsuit. This makes it likely that the two of them staged the accident.
These love token paperweights are made with one-of-a-kind collages that I have created from aged, stained, and water
More people definitely was inside the room like 5 minutes before Dear Cloud took the stage. They were definitely the one that people have been waiting to see. Since they are currently preparing for the new EP, it was definitely a very rare chance to see they perform life. I admit I did put my expectation on their performance, since I really had not got a chance to see them performing their songs in a band format. Last time in The Bridge (I should really post my review on this one too), they only performed in an acoustic format. So, I did not get to see they perform 'Lip', my favorite song. Yeap, they finally took the stage and people were left stunned at first. I saw Nine9, the vocalist went on to the stage with a supporter. Nine9 injured her ankle yet she managed to stand for the 1st song.
I went to see my new boyfriend.
a) 20% reduced risk
Memory and also processor:
What’s the point of acting if you’re no longer interested in being famous?
(2) It retards the growth of the yeast plant.
This has been a time of great growth for me, and yet this is only the first part of my journey back to life. I’m taking care of my 95-year-old father, and when he is gone, I will have to find a place to live, a reason to live, something to care about. I’ll have to completely start over. I’m trying to see the good in that, but since I haven’t a clue what to do or where to go, mostly I’m just waiting.
My oldest nephew on my husband's side turned eight in March, which means a very exciting event occurred. He got baptized! In our church children are baptized at eight rather than as an infant. We believe children aren't held accountable for their choices before this and therefore can't "sin." (Yeah they still make wrong choices but they're mistakes are covered through the Savior's atonement before eight--without needing repentance). Anyway, at eight we believe they are old enough to decide if they want to be baptized and also to start choosing right from wrong and start repenting for mistakes. (the CTR stands for "Choose the Right").
Besides, MySpace has, for so long, been a haven for a veritable myriad of people recording not-terribly-good tunes in their back-bedrooms that it has never really appealed to me in my (always ongoing) search for new music. It’s not just the (potentially endless) trawl through rubbish that puts one off; it’s the simple fact that there aren’t enough hours in the day… even if one wanted to spend one’s every waking minute staring at a screen wearing headphones… and listening; sifting the wheat from the chaff.
In addition to the importance of the fossilised stumps, the building itself is important because not only is the Fossil grove one of the world’s oldest examples of conservation of a geological site, it was the first to be preserved by a building. A viewing balcony overlooks the fossils, and small displays provide information and interpret the site for visitors.
Somebody told me there is no right or wrong answers
2. Baby names. We found a name early on that I loved. We've struggled for a middle name, but we've been solid on the first name for many, many months. Only, now I'm having second thoughts. I have lots of "maybes," but I'm really having trouble. Finding the right middle name seems like an impossibility right now. Argh. There are so many names I love, but not for this child, for various reasons. Picking a name is so much harder than I ever thought it would be, especially the second time around.
What this guy said…
A person at Starbucks asked me what kind of dog I had? It was because of the dog hairs on my fleece.
‘Loads,’ said Alan. He regretted telling him.
almost everyone agreed that Mary’s church was backward-looking, unimaginative, reactionary, sharing both the Queen’s bitter preoccupation with the past and her tragic sterility. Marian Catholicism, it was agreed, was strong on repression, weak on persuasion. Its atrocious campaign of burnings was not merely an outrage against human decency but a devastating political blunder …. Its apologists and polemicists were dismissed as unimpressive second-raters, their works tedious and unimaginative, the regime in general fatally unaware of the crucial importance of argument and debate in the battle for hearts and minds, and neglectful of the power of both the pulpit and the printing press in that struggle (1).
Dimon argued that the financial system could be trusted; that the near-meltdown of 2008 was a perfect storm that would never happen again. Since then, J.P. Morgan’s lobbyists and lawyers have done everything in their power to eviscerate the Volcker rule — creating exceptions, exemptions, and loopholes that effectively allow any big bank to go on doing most of the derivative trading it was doing before the near-meltdown. And now — only a few years after the banking crisis that forced American taxpayers to bail out the Street, caused home values to plunge by more than 30 percent and pushed millions of homeowners underwater, threatened or diminished the savings of millions more, and sent the entire American economy hurtling into the worst downturn since the Great Depression — J.P. Morgan Chase recapitulates the whole debacle with the same kind of errors, sloppiness, bad judgment, excessively risky trades poorly-executed and poorly-monitored, that caused the crisis in the first place.
Two years ago today I was bored. Two years ago today I found Teen Book Review and decided that hey, I could do that! Two years ago, I was a terrible blogger.
Novelist Meg Wolitzer has a thoughtful essay in yesterday’s New York Times Book Review about women’s literary fiction and how it often is unjustly relegated to “the second shelf” below books by men. She notes, however, that she is using the term “women’s fiction” to discuss “literature that happens to be written by women,” and not ”a certain type of fast-reading novel, which sets its sights almost exclusively on women readers and may well find a big ready-made audience.”
After eating, Mr. T and I sat down on the couch and talked. I petted his bare calves, grinning at the layer of orange fur.
Stamp:CL514 Life of the Party Birthday, S5447 Large Plain Pattern-Hero Arts
The December Holidays are right around the corner and we are definitely in the spirit here at First Grade and Fancy Free. We've added two new items to our teachers pay teachers store.
So this question is really a question of smarts. Are they smart enough to see the train coming down the track? Are we smart enough to sound the horn instead of patiently waiting for China to answer a diffident phone call?
On Thursday, April 26th at 7pm Amherst Cove Consolidated Home & School will be holding a meeting with guest speaker will be Corporal Andy Cooke, Supervisor of the Street Drug Unit of the East Prince RCMP Detachment. Everyone is welcome to attend.
"Did she really say i'm a bad twitterrer?"
c) gens 'family' - because only the genuine members of the family could inherit.
Pure Radio also said that despite not being able to fund research, they have “continued to build on our record of successfully developing volunteers”,. What is interesting is that over the past four years there has been an increase in not only the population served by community radio, but a rise in volunteers working to boost community stations across the country.
and even now as you memorize the order of the planets,
Wishing the return of cricket won’t make it come true. The PCB and the Government both have a role to play in ensuring that Pakistan once again hosts the greatest game there is at the international level. Bangladesh are set to tour Pakistan in April, in essence after being bribed to do so. The security for that visit needs to be far better than what it was for Sri Lanka. Speaking of which, the culprits of the Sri Lanka shootings need to be apprehended. Easier said than done, I’m sure, but it should have been of the highest priority to start off with to track down the reason behind the shootings. The domestic circuit of cricket also needs to be strengthened. Pakistan needs to be able to host domestic tournaments successfully before thinking about inviting teams other than Bangladesh or Zimbabwe. Perhaps the absence of international cricket can give the PCB an opportunity to figure out a way to get crowds to the Quaid-e-Azam trophy. These are only a few of many steps that can be taken to get us back on track to re-enter the fold of international cricket. Let’s hope that if Imran Khan is able to continue his ‘tsunami’ and gets to the top, he won’t forget about the game that got him there. In the meantime, we can all continue to enjoy the phenomenal rise of Misbah’s men!
Ben dashed down the moving staircase, the stolen wallet bulky in his jeans’ pocket. Behind him, in the beehive noise of the mall, shouts rose, though barely above the thunderous pounding of his heart. He jumped steps by twos, oblivious to the disapproving looks his rough flight elicited.
He said this would ensure that PAS candidates would not stray from the Islamic principles, ways and objectives.
We soon got another French teacher, a young attractive woman who got us eager to get near the front of the class. Not only was she good-looking but French seemed to get easier. This beauty was magical. She just made it seem so easy. We were having tests and getting percentages in the late 90s. I got 99% in one test! You can't imagine the self-confidence eye contact with a beautiful woman, a smile, a 'congratulations' for being damn near perfect in her tests gave us. French was a wonderful language, the language of love and success. It wasn't until we got a proper French teacher that we found out how far behind in the syllabus we had got. She was teaching us baby stuff.
What about the Wisk commercials featuring that dreaded phrase "ring around the collar"? The way it was pronounced was so scolding, so judgmental, so disgusted. Totally effective.
I was not at all sure that I would. I found reading the books such an emotionally intense, devastating experience - I haven't been that wrecked by a story for a long time. I'd intended to do a review of the trilogy for the blog after I was done with them, but regular readers will know that I never did. I didn't even mention having finished reading them. I couldn't. It was too personal and I felt too raw about it.
And those shoes would walk the streets of New York City....
there are two dried up, motionless little earthworms on our back patio.
Well, true enough, put in that patronising way, but being asked how I am feeling when a friend meets me after some time seems pretty normal to me. They better be prepared for comments about how I really am feeling though, if the question is sincere....
Oh Allah, take your enemies, the enemies of Islam. Oh Allah, take the Jews, the treacherous aggressors. Oh Allah, take this profligate, cunning, arrogant band of people. Oh Allah, they have spread much tyranny and corruption in the land. Pour Your wrath upon them, oh our God. Lie in wait for them. Oh Allah, You annihilated the people of Thamoud at the hand of a tyrant, and You annihilated the people of ‘Aad with a fierce, icy gale. Oh Allah, You annihilated the people Thamoud at the hand of a tyrant, You annihilated the people of ‘Aad with a fierce, icy gale, and You destroyed the Pharaoh and his soldiers – oh Allah, take this oppressive, tyrannical band of people. Oh Allah, take this oppressive, Jewish, Zionist band of people. Oh Allah, do not spare a single one of them. Oh Allah, count their numbers, and kill them, down to the very last one.
eating whenever you feel like it is not a healthy eating habit, disruptive, unfair to other students, and sort of gross. Gross school lunches are however a good point. Make sure your kid eats healthy for all other meals and pack him an apple or something. My Response: There is a lot of room between "eating at lunchtime for 20 minutes" and "eating whenever you feel like it." Even offering students a few chances to eat during the day would be an improvement. Although, as an adult, I do eat whenever I feel like it. What could be a healthier way to eat? Eat when you are hungry. Don't eat when you're not. Do you still eat by the clock? And your solution to the problem of the school lunches being gross is to "make sure your kid eats healthy for the other meals," really? That's assuming every kid has access to healthy food outside school, which is just not the case. How about we try to make better options available in schools?
Swing Bill
Bells Oatmeal Stout
And what was the deal with the sandwiches? If these stupid poor hillbillies were so poor and destitute, where in the hell did they come up with these sandwiches night after night after night? And what about breakfast? Lunch? Wasn't there anything else in the house? And how did Junior Samples With A Shotgun get so fat if they have so little to eat? And how do you live high on the hog in the Witness Protection Program? According to Henry Hill, that isn't how it works!
And the reason I’m writing this post, the newest quirk that put the idea in my head, is that she has recently decided she simply doesn’t want her bedtime bottle anymore. No weaning for this kid: she’s gone cold turkey. Honestly, how many kids do that? Don’t you usually have to deal with months of crying and arguing to work a kid off their nighttime bottle?
When I do get stuck outside in the rain I like to stay as dry as possible. Under the bench is good, under the car better. But the best place is to squeeze down the passage at the side of the house and wait it out.
Printed Paper
SAINT SANGUINUS tells the story of Peredur, a Welsh Dark Ages warrior on his last raid against the Irish who attack their settlements in the absence of the Romans. Peredur wants to gather as much battlefield spoils as he can before approaching Tanwen’s father, intending to ask for her hand in marriage. But a spear to his chest puts an end to his dreams, and as he curses God with his dying breath, his curse calls forth a member of the Brethren to gather him to their work.
But we’d like to talk about a couple of other measures that are getting some interest: Return on Engagement and Share of Conversation. That’s what the next postis about.
Good advice.
We bring glory by becoming a imitator of Christ’s life – Spiritual maturity is to become like Jesus in the way we think, feel and act. The more we develop into a Christlike charactef, the more we bring glory to God.
and by cutting off grains
47. Thee Headcoats - We're Gone
I do not want this to ever sound like I am complaining about my job, but I am here to state a fact. THIS IS A HARD PROFESSION; YOU HAVE TO PAY YOUR DUES. I am going to be the first to say that I feel my due are almost all paid up. I do have some yet to pay but I have moved up the ladder. I have been rewarded some fantastic opportunities. I have a Masters, I work with some amazing athletes at Talisman Centre, I have a great situation working for the Canadian Sports Centre and with Cross Country Canada. Every day I see the up dates on Twitter my heart explodes with pride. Teaching at the University of Calgary is one highlight of my week. My professional relationships with the group over at Natural Way Chiropractic and Dave at Tower Physio make my job easier every day. I AM TRULY BLESSED TO LIVE THE LIFE I DO.
never ending thirst for barrels of sweet ale
WE ARE… PENN STATE!
Good morning! How are you? I hope all is well! If you are curious to know, I did get outside to enjoy working in my garden this week. Although the snow hasn't shown up again, it has been quite a cool week with hard frosts most nights. Hopefully, my flowers took it in stride and I didn't lose any of them. The sun peeked out during the day and it sure felt wonderful! There is nothing better than the sun on your face!
I’m trying to figure out if this is awkward, unnatural, or possibly even dangerous. I think about those incidents of workplace violence where surviving witnesses say things like “he was always so quiet,” and wonder if one of my neighbors is a seething psychopath, just waiting to squeeze in a little gunplay amidst the filing deadlines.
This is my stock of rough pine. It's about 6" wide and 1 1/4" thick and rough on all sides, meaning no smooth sides. I prefer working with wood like this. I can make it whatever size I need and find a satisfaction in taking the wood from rough boards to a finished product.
We are also facing attacks on our communities. The Labour led Rhondda Cynon Taf council recently sent out section 188 notices to its 10,000 strong workforce, which threatened them with the sack if they did not sign new contracts which would ensure that the workers loose on average between £2,000-4,000 per year! On top of this the council has proposed a rise in council tax by nearly 3%!
Here they are:
Fabric - left over fabric from another project, $0
Dear Borders, I Miss You.
Thank you for agreeing with me, the second thing is Photoshop. Its not made by apple, so it will work, maybe, I don’t know?.. Of course you don’t know, because you’re not living the nightmare. May I quickly refresh your memory
With POD and e-books, everybody can have it any way they want.
They also have a Happy Hour from 3:00 to 8:00 p.m. (during the week). During the happy hour, they offer buy 1 get 1 free for house pouring by the glass. The last, but not least, attention bikers, if you go there by bike on Sundays and order a dish, you get a glass of ice tea for free. Fun idea, isn’t it?
I got home at 9.30 last night from moving delicate stuff like TVs and computers in the car!
Chicken and Vegetables in Wine Sauce
Quite a sad post this one.
If your boys are like mine, they need to be supervised with the sticks, so that no one looses an eye.
p.p.s. Time for our Random Video o’ the Week! This week goes to “Dubstep Puffle“, a video from the official channel for Club Penguin, consisting of a dark gray pet Puffle wearing a pair of headphones, listening to dubstep, while in numerous situations, like living memes and riding inside a box in space that is farting out a rainbow. At the end of the video, you can snag a secret code to get your Puffle their own set of headphones, although I’m not sure it’s gonna be dubstep they’ll be listening to. Anyway, since its debut on the 5th this month, it’s gotten almost 400,000 views, but with you I can bet cold hard fake cash it’s gonna go longer.
these band members created their own rules in the studio
January we found out we were pregnant with Little One number two. And basically lived in the doctor's office for the first eight weeks. Everything's fine now - just a lil' stressful at the beginning.
*Medium sizzlet die- Bride 2 - 5.00 (do a search for what it looks like, cant see die in pic)
I agree wih their call to justice in health, but I think advocacy comes with knowledge. Rather than marching out to demosntrate, I need to gather facts first - in my own way. Then with time, perhaps, I will be able to advocate from my own heart what I have established in my own little corner of research.
Bake in loaf tin or 9” x 9“ cake tin
What a productive weekend. I'm very happy.
Racked: 02-20-2009
* Advanced Backup: Backup and restore photos and call history in addition to contacts. Restore them to a new device.
When I found this scale in a local antiques shop, I thought I would use it in my kitchen, but my
My intention with my writing is to bring an emotional language to children who are stuck in difficult situations without the means to express what’s going on for them. I hope my books bring a sense of possibility to kids, helping them to navigate their way through challenging situations. I feel it’s important to show that recognising and speaking their needs to somebody is a key to finding resolution to difficulty and that it’s possible to embrace all hurt and pain through love. It’s also important for me to show that the ‘bad’ kids aren’t usually inherently bad, just suffering the hurt and pain of the family situation they find themselves in.
In Catholic churches, the most popular colours for the Advent candles are purple and rose. In the Western church, purple is the historic liturgical color for three of the four Sundays of Advent: once the color associated with royalty, it symbolizes Christ as the "Prince of Peace." Rose is the color for the Third Sunday of
Now here’s something I didn’t think we’d see: a sequel to Ang Lee’s disappointing 2003 version of the Hulk, Marvel’s big green superhero-monster-thing. It’s not precisely a sequel though — for those who’ve somehow missed the behind-the-scenes goings on, this one has an all-new cast and crew, led by Hulk-fan Edward Norton on both leading man and (uncredited) writing duties. But does that mean it’s any better?
So the reason for the pepto? I'm not really sure to be honest but I came home last night, ate some Trader Joe's Flaxseed Chips and then thought I was gonna die from stomach pains. It was pretty bad and pretty instantaneous and lasted almost all night.
Haha I guess I love pasta and vegan cheese sauce, but this recipe of Angela’s was also a favourite – I have actually made this four times since she posted it, and I always make double the sauce amount and freeze half of it for a future date. That way the time-consuming part (making the sauce) is already done, so a quick pasta dinner is really just that – a quick pasta dinner! And it freezes just fine.
So, have you painted a wall pinkish? Tried the margarita cupcakes? Got a good non-fiction book you loved? Fun plans for the weekend? I’d love to hear!
The rest of my day was spent doing pretty much nothing in the room. I ended up cleaning up a bit, emptying out all of our trash and stuff so that the room was a little tidier, but, other than that, I just sat around, bored.
Quietly, without expletives, I wondered the same thing.
1. His and Her Blogs. There were endless blogs to each other. Everyday, there were daily posts on each of their blogs and although some of them eventually turned into the general day to day, I could clearly see that they were written and meant for each other. Even in the earlier days post reconciliation, it clearly looked like my husband was giving her hope. Sure, he still says that it was only hope that things will get better for her, but they can easily be misinterpreted as “Please hold on as this getting back together thing with the wife might not work out after all”, especially to an already depressed and crazy desperate woman.
A classic is never out of fashion. Louis Vuitton’s Sac Plat in the Monogram canvas– one of the most recognizable icons of the luxury world– has earned this distinction because it so effectively marries fashion with function. This Monogram tote is as durable and practical as it is stylish.
I will be pontificating about Super Bowl advertising on a TV show on Monday and I'd like to be able to reference the opinions of ad and marketing professionals (that's you!)
Tip #5: Commit to ongoing policy support Installing the executive benefits program is just the beginning. Ongoing support helps to make sure the program is running like a well-oiled machine. It’s important to work with a provider who offers ongoing support that is personalized, knowledgeable, and customer-centric.
I will understand.
People will call us radicals, fanatics, disturbers of peace. And maybe we are. But this isn’t politics, and no matter who we are, we have equal rights to a weapon called logic, and a weapon called compassion. You’ll never see us use these weapons to attack, but we do occasionally wield them to defend against politics. But we’re not afraid, because when you have the truth, it doesn’t collapse.
“Look up,” Matt says.
It is the calm and the storm together turning their backs to me
It's a deep but very emtertaining flick IMO and perhaps the best movie Chuck Norris ever starred in.
After my second tubal pregnancy I realized 3 children was all I could I give birth to and I wanted to adopt a fatherless child through DHS. But more than this I wanted His plan for my life. I see it unfolding.
Sometimes, I come across some pretty funny things that have nothing to do with what I’m writing about, but I love them anyways.
That’s the promise that Thompson and the DLP put in writing and it’s a promise that they broke with their first piece of legislation that killed the Graeme Hall National Park, and since then in many other cases.
Here are just a few of ours. Think you know whose is whose? Maybe for some, but I bet you'd be surprised by at least a few!
Well, that's about it. If you have any questions, I'll try to answer them if I can. I hope you can use some of this information to make your own cards.
DEMONSTRATION IN DEFENCE OF JOBS, EMPLOYMENT RIGHTS,
11. Jess, a brilliant baker and cook who I met on FoodBuzz and I’ve only just started following on Twitter. Drop by http://cake-o-cake.blogspot.in/ and you’ll be glad you did.
In True Confections, Zip's Candies has a red and black licorice line called Mumbo Jumbos, named for Little Black Sambo's parents. These are a pair of red and black licorice discs about the dimensions of a backgammmon piece. I await the call for product licensing for this among several of my more reasonable fictional candy lines. But of course, not all gummi lovers would accept Mumbo Jumbos or the nonfictional Red Vines and Twizzlers as gummi, per se. I regret that I didn't have Alice ponder the distinctions, the equatorial line dividing the gummi hemisphere and the licorice hemisphere.
2. Tej. What is it? you’re probably asking. It’s an Ethiopian honey wine, and it’s very good. It’s similar to mead, but it’s fermented with gesho, a variety of the buckthorn tree/bush. It’s common in Ethiopian restaurants (which are easy to find in New York, Washington D.C., and the Twin Cities) and it’s possible to make it at home. Can bars source it from their regular distributors? I have no idea. But a number of American wineries make it. Harry Kloman, a University of Pittsburgh professor who runs an exhaustive page on Tej, lists some in California and New York. Kloman also tells you where to find gesho (it’s generally around $7 a pound) and how to make Tej yourself. It’s actually really easy.
I offered it up for the smashing;
All in all, if you’re looking for a fun time for your kid’s 10th birthday, this will be a fun experience for the whole party as the kids spend a day as pirates. However, if you’re looking for a theatrical dinner show with a plot and good food, then this isn’t the “adventure” for you. You’d be better off watching “Pirates of the Caribbean” at home with delivered pizza.
Then there was my 3rd grade teacher. One Mrs. McCarty. She had no pity, love or undersatnding for my plight.
He is a member of the bar of the Supreme Court of Indiana. He served as City Attorney, for Ellettsville, Indiana. He also served as Judge Pro Tempore for the Superior Court of Monroe County.
MAC Fluidline in Blacktrack (Patted over the black as something for the glitter to stick to)
Politics (as evidenced in the states) will be merely a popularity competition with no substance, because people will not understand the substance of politics any more.
This is another one of my favorites. The road signs all have velcro on the back so they can be moved around. The garage is a little pocket that the car can park in. I planned on attaching the car with a shoelace--I even went out and bought some just for that reason--but last minute I decided to keep the car free. I'm hoping it doesn't get lost. It hasn't yet!
There is also a nice quote from a Dutch traffic engineer.
I look around and everything has stopped, time has stood still. I see my dog suddenly bound towards me, I pat him on the head and laugh at the confused smile on his long, smiling face. My canine companion quickly then forgets his confusion as he’s seen something far more interesting! I watch him heading off to nibble on a literally frozen ice cream which is been held by a small boy as he gingerly waits to tuck in!
“The police kept me at the station before throwing me out after a couple of hours.
I know, I was as shocked as you.
Johnny Ryan: HP is unusual among leading consumer technology suppliers in having entered the 3D printer market, which seems to be crowded with specialist firms. What was the thinking on this, and on entering the 3D printer space?
Following along with the Mother's Day theme I made a card in the shape of a flower pot.
There is so much you could do with this holder. Party favor's add a gift card to them for a birthday gift. I can really see these as a weeding or baby shower favor. And let's not forget you can change out the size to hold a package of instant coca. The ideas are endless!
I've got to say, it really was pretty easy. A few things worked against me... my canvas is smaller than the one he's using, I don't have a multitude of brushes and I don't have a good brush cleaning system going. Overall though, I am very please with how I've done so far. My snow and happy tree techniques are lacking, but since my intent is to paint desert sunsets, snow really won't come into play often. Nor will pine trees, of which I am not a big fan of anyways.
Tools: Simply Scored, Stampin Dimensionals, SNAIL, Crimper, Paper Piercer, Everyday Enchantment Brads.
Some things in life never work out the way we want them to.
jackals circled the city,
Registration is open. Workshop Fee – $350
The troops are but drilling, they are yet surrounded with smiles.
BARTON: It may mean that they should consider it, even merely to hedge their career and to have opportunities in the future. I don’t think it should be mandated to have a securities license but if insurance agents want to move into that, it would be a wonderful time to start looking at it. Ultimately, there will be fewer companies in the insurance space. We are seeing a shrinkage and consolidation that is only going to accelerate. You have companies that are pulling out of the United States, and you have others that are doubling down on the United States. And that’s why if you have bet the farm on basically one or two products, you’re missing out on an incredible opportunity to help that client.
First things first: I’ve been sitting on this Panini America Personal Collection Spotlight entry from Pennsylvania collector Ken Wagner for more than a year. I had the best of intentions to run it long, long ago, but for any number of reasons, I never did.
I used pretty much everyone old on this card, except for the jingle bell charm. For the new year, I do have a resolution and shall get to that later.
Situation in the Balkans – 2012 compared to 2011. The numbers in parentheses show the figures for 2011. The smaller the nummber of the rating, the better the rank and status (‘Free’: rating 1-30; ‘Partly Free’: 31 – 60. ‘Not Free’: rating 61 – 100).
I will remember the sunshine, the breeze, the scent of jasmine on the wind. I will remember the freedom of allowing my children to run unfettered outside under blossoming fruit trees.
You don’t need to be a psychologist to understand what makes people tick.
Pretties for your weekend. ox
Isn't that what everyone does when it's 96 degrees out?
Water liberally
Do you ever notice that the Louvre is a little bit like Ikea? True, there's no need for an allen wrench at the Louvre, but whenever I go there, I see families in distress, marriages falling apart, people standing in the middle of one gallery flummoxed as how to get to where they really want to be. Getting out can be as tough as getting in and you may end up in Mesopotamian sculpture when you thought you were headed for Old Masters, or in couches when all you really want to look at is bookcases. And the jockeying to read the signage in the special exhibitions is strangely similar to looking for a parking place in Ikea's lot on Saturday afternoon.
My mother didn’t come cheap either, so he would have had to start stealing cattle from the white farmers if he wanted more wives. She cost him 40 head of cattle back in the 80’s. But wow, was she worth every cow! You should see her today in her Chanel dress …but 5 of them?
A social movement of 19th-century English textile artisans who protested - often by destroying mechanized looms – against the changes produced by Industrial_Revolution that replaced them with less skilled, low wage labour, and which they felt were leaving them without work and changing their way of life (Wikipedia)
At the point where it looks like they’re both going to declare their feelings, tragedy strikes. Wikham has eloped with Miss Bennet’s sister, the 16-year-old Lydia. It’s a scandal and one that threatens to ruin the reputation of not only Lydia but all of her sisters by association. Miss Bennet returns home immediately and she thinks she will never see Mr Darcy again.
Well, anyway, I’d be awfully surprised if the muse did not visit at least one of the writers in his dreams, tantalizing him with her beautiful, confusing, confounding poetry…
Love gives.
Contact With Chaos by Michael Z Williamson (good)
Fits of life
Walsh said: “We need to be honest and mature – if you’re going to have a……
I hope everyone had a great weekend! It is gorgeous here in Myrtle Beach! My hubby and I sat on the patio most of the day. I did however, take some time to do a little painting. I thought I would share the projects I did today.
Photo 4 = The center of the Born of Blood cover from the home page
Here is the stash of yarn I've accumulated over the past couple of weeks. Some of this is from Knitpicks too.
Our children recently watched the Beatles animated film Yellow Submarine. They loved it and began acting out the stories and characters in imaginative play. As a Beatle fan, I have the Beatles records and their other films in the house. Over the past few weeks we’ve also watched A Hard Days Night and Help!
And like a warm breeze on a spring afternoon you'll be refreshed again. The winter months are behind you. It's time to remember, time to forgive, time to quiet the roar of life and start living.
For some unknown, technical reason, I'm having issues posting. I've had to revert to the old editing system within Blogger, which is a pain in the you-know-what. I'm hoping the issue will be resolved shortly, so until then, I apologise if the posts look weird (extra line spaces etc). Google may have changed some of their settings which has impacted on me being able to post efficiently.
a woman shouts, Never have
Two, I feel better. I don’t feel like I’m missing the world or not wanting to be a part of it. I’m not singing the blues or channeling my inner goth. I don’t feel so blaaaahhhh tee blah blaaaaahhhhhh. I feel somewhat good.
You may enter as many times as you like and combine it with as many challenges as you wish.
*(I’m such a liar. I didn’t give up Starbucks… like, AT ALL. I’ve heard other people say it’s a great way to save up for a trip. For me, it’s a great way for me to want to give up on living. I canceled my Norton anti-virus subscription, instead. Beware if I send you any e-mails requesting wired money to save the prime minister of Nigeria.)
JetBlue took about 900 employees when it moved to its new location. Their departure has affected the amount of business some store owners near the towers are getting since the company left.
The bill will be sponsored by Republican Rep. Jim Barton of Mobile in the House and by Republican Sen. Cam Ward of Alabaster in the Senate.
The seven days I explored different villages – mountainous Ubud, funky Kuta, groovy Seminyak, picturesque Padangbhai. Somehow, I managed to get a 45% discount on a Dolphin cruise and day trip to Lambongon Island, it was a lucky day to be roaming around the village where a chap in the corner was distributing pamphlets with all their prices slashed! Lambongon is a mini-paradiso, one can snorkel, eat, swim in pools, ride banana boats – tan on the decks of the huge Catamaran that took us there – on a clear day catch the view of Gunung Agung, the last active volcano on the island of Bali.
Is The Ice Pirates funny at all, then? There is ONE scene at the end where everyone, good guys and bad guys, end up fighting on their spaceship as it goes through a time warp, and everyone rapidly ages and time passes in fits and lurches while people sprout ridiculously long gray/white hairdos, babies get born, age and become old enough to join in the fray, robots get beaten up, repair themselves and get upgrades and everyone runs around like a Benny Hill sketch. THAT much is funny, but it doesn't last nearly as long as it should to make up for the deadeningly brain-numbing stupidity we witnessed before.
3) Sharing with fellow believers how God has blessed him by a verse.
Avenue, but it wasn’t quite what I expected. I have to be honest, for about the first half of the book, it was annoying me beyond all belief, however I kept at it because I hate not finishing books, and I also like to hold out hope that things will suddenly get much better, which they did. Around about chapter
At 12 weeks old she has probably already needed us as much as she ever will as a child. Depressingly, but rightly, as it should be.
Janet's Blog ~ #7 Maria
What in the world would make someone imply that I am NOT smart because I make sacrifices to homeschool my children? I'm doing what God has called me and told me to do. Proverbs 22:6 tells us, "Train up a child in the way he should go and when he is old, he will not depart from it." I am convicted that I cannot train them up in the way they should go if they're at school more than they're at home during waking hours. They're not just learning the 3 Rs at our house. They're not just learning history facts and dates at our house. My boys are learning how to serve GOD!
As I sat in the room waiting, I noticed how easy it was for me to hear what was going on in the hallway, and in the room right next to me. It didn't bother me much, really, but I didn’t know how many patients might be around to hear my possible screaming, so it kind of messed up my focus for a sec. Then I tried taking some deep breaths to calm myself a bit, and pretty soon the doctor and nurse came back in, and we got to work.
Transition now back to the Country Casa. We're still under construction. The last 6 months of work have focused on outdoor projects, and Clint is just now getting back to tending to indoor projects. I'll admit to having done a bit of footstomping at the end of the summer, and asking (asking/demanding, potato/ potahto) for a myriad of quick-fixes to make living here more efficient, less cluttered, and thus a lot less stressful. We still aren't ready for our magazine spread (unless Better Homes & Gardens is looking for "Construction Chic"), but things are a bit more orderly.
Preheat grill to medium. Place beef and remaining red pepper on skewers, alternating the meat and peppers. Grill 6-8 minutes for medium rare, turning every couple of minutes.
"Ah, that's a mystery," he replied. "I just don't know."
and one for Senator Portman.
Moms go through a great deal and I always thought that teenagers years were the worse, I know I myself gave my parents lots of headaches and disappointments as a teenager. Then again, my oldest is only 8 and I feel I already went through 10 times worse of whatever my parents experienced with the 3 of us.
This final step may be difficult to see on the photo but it really important to make your image stand out, using Old Photo ink (the smallest amount possible on the brush) just draw a tiny line around the outline of the face hair, apron and spoon. Then pick up a small amount of Worn Lipstick mixed with Tea Dye and so the same on the Dress, Shoes and Scarf
I’ve given you everything
But here too was another lesson, one of primary influence on my life and work.
And have become my salvation.
First Alison and Loren spoke about their profound connection with Coehlo’s story. The hidden meanings, the biblical allusions. The simplicity of the message within. “Sometimes we all have to make that decision,” said Alison. “To leave our flock and follow our dreams.”
Ushuaia, Argentina
Come to think of it, last time he was here I was sick too.
Although the original 'Gastrotypographicalassemblage' isn't on show a rather lovely specially-created, half scale, photographic reproduction is, as you can see below...
I apologize again for being over a week late. I have been super busy with work and having company in town, but I finally got a day off of work, so I’m devoting a part of it to finally writing this post.
Give you my heart
Apply by linking twitter or tumblr. References may be requested.
This cute little Easter tree was a flea market buy for $1.00. The pot that it was in originally was not working so I cut down the styrofoam base and bought a little pot at the Dollar Store, added some moss and a bunny and a few eggs....
3.Preheat oven to 375 degrees. Coat bottom of a 9-by-13-inch ovenproof baking dish with 1 teaspoon oil. Place beans in a food processor. Finely grate remaining garlic clove over beans. Puree 1 minute. Scrape down sides of bowl, add reserved bean liquid, and puree until smooth, about 1 minute. Add oregano, and pulse until just combined.
Green Button
“AC/DC’s fans came out in force this weekend to get tickets to the band’s upcoming ‘Black Ice’ tour,” said David Marcus, Ticketmaster’s senior vice president, Music. “A live AC/DC event promises to be a legendary rock show. We’re glad Paperless Ticket™ helped fan club members and fans get tickets at face value for designated seats.”
“How much money do you have stashed underneath there?”
I ran downstairs to see what I could make from what I already owned. The butterfly stickers were laying on the back desk so I grabbed them and attached them to toothpicks and skewers. Then I made a little bunting that says - love who you are.
Ooi said the people who had made the exposé were so ignorant that they did not know that Christians pray with their hands raised and may have misunderstood it as an oath.
HEAVENS FOR THE FEW WHO STRIVE
From my WIP *Yet Untitled*: Winged beasts attack a boys mother. But then he discovers that she was never his mother and he is now hunted by powerful Gods who want to kill him and his siblings who he's never met.
:: Birthdays :: Oli turned 26 in December, I turned 24. We feel like we are getting old but we are just getting to the prime of our lives! There is so much ahead of us!
Plan Once, Strategize Often
Cheryl: I have such a long list, but I’ll limit myself to a few: Laura Ingalls Wilder for her keen eye for detail; Lucy Maud Montgomery for her flowing descriptions that allow readers to paint wonderful pictures in their minds; and Kathi Macias for her ability to tell powerful stories that stay with you a long time after you’ve read them.
Water: 32 oz.
The ladies are going to arrive soon for class. Sarah is home and should be here-it will depend on how tired she is. Survivor and Idol tonight. With all the TV watching in my near future I could have Tea Leaves finished by the time I come back to work on Tuesday.
Asked what he believed his life song was, the inimitable Belafonte once remarked: "The same melody. It just needs to be sung again. What it needs are more voices of harmony. It's a beautiful chord that everybody gets to sing in the same place at the same time with the same purpose. The song is the same: justice."
Without the simple lines of this coat, the print wouldn't work. Without the print, this coat wouldn't work. Which to me, makes a perfectly perfect Spring coat. I was inspired by a couple of black and white
YA Bound is hosting a 25 stop blog tour for Retro Geeks by Karen Mueller Bryson. This tour kicks off June 25th and will run for a one week blast tour. If you're interested in signing up for this tour and receiving an e-book review copy, please email Trish YABoundGirls @gmail.com with Retro Geeks Blog Tour in the subject line.
Thank you, Erin! It looks so delicious! Can't wait to try it! Now everybody go have a drink!!
Can you create the future of your dreams? Are paranormal abilities like seeing into the future or affecting objects with your mind really possible? And how do energetic systems of healing — like homeopathy and hands-on healing — actually work?
All of the things I'd been and been good at in my life were suddenly hindered by studies that said I was of lower intelligence, disabled, lazy at my job, a burden on the NHS, a child abuser, a murderer and undesirable in communities.
but I dreamt big dreams
He was late. And when he did finally arrive, he seemed unprepared. He had the jittery, showy energy of a street mime, making fun of the title of the workshop, I suppose as a way of endearing himself to the young people. I tried to remind myself that the brothers were there, first and foremost, to live our their vows to Christ and the community, and second, to reach the young. Whether or not I liked him was of absolutely no consequence. Still, there were two things I remember well from that hour:
From this book I learned that pureed potatoes are completely different from mashed potatoes. That pureed potatoes are ethereal. They are the star of the meal, not the side. They are what the best food you eat is all about.
In essence, the basic approach is to be in the moment, rather than mulling over the past or the future – each time you find your mind digging its claws into some thought, you gently release it and return your attention to whatever you are doing.
Harry Potter World at Universal Studios.
Callie: “I will, were you planning to drop the rent off tonight?”
Happy 15 months old baby girl! You are growing up to be a pretty little girl. Each day you are less of a baby BUT I still look at you like my baby.
Legal Expert David Boies Discusses The 'Constitutionality' of The Birth Control Mandate
It was hailed as the biggest game in English Premier League history, a true spectacle of sorts. An estimated 650 million people (about a tenth of the global population) tuned in to watch the drama unfold. The city of Manchester imposed a 24-hour alcohol ban in anticipation of it. Yes, the Manchester Derby was a monumental event, more than just a mere European football game. Unfortunately, for the legion of Manchester United fans worldwide, the end result was a crushing defeat.
Luke: Oh, I can't believe I forgot the Samoas!
(Bloomsbury 2006), which has been optioned for film by Johnny Depp’s production company, Infinitum Nihil. His face and his words have graced the hallowed pages of The New York Times, Interview, Frieze, Vice, Tin House, and Art in America. He and his wife are proprietors of the design and illustration studio Plankton Art Co. Their most notable project to date is the collection of 400 species identification illustrations that are on permanent display at the American Museum of Natural History’s Hall of Ocean Life. A devoted enthusiast, lower-case adventurer, and explorer of what he calls “the local frontier,” Whimsy spends most of his time among the nooks and margins of the forgotten, the curious, and the speculative that is found beneath, around, and between the everyday. He smells like gusto.
I commit myself to challenging my own preconceptions of myself where I push myself to challenge that which I believe about myself and believe that I am not capable of and where I believe I will just fail as usual.
I took it nice & slow with the run, & reveled in how great it felt to be running again. Princess was fine during the run - she was a little whiny afterwards, but nothing that a little ibuprofen & ice couldn't silence.
Levi has had an on and off runny nose for the last couple of weeks.
I decided to turn out the area under the stairs in the hall. "I'll help you," said the Sage, which I thought was nice of him. I was free this morning so this was to be the day. "You won't throw away anything before I've seen it, will you?" said the Sage which, I realised, was the reason for his helpful attitude. Hmm. I told him I wouldn't throw away anything of his before he'd seen it.
or your back is aching
Japan is amongst the least 'Diverse' countries on the planet, yet they are in the top five economies, only recently being overtaken by China!
What now do I see, whom do I believe
Total = $13.48
Administrator Service server. Refer to the man page for vxsvc(1M).
The FlashTag collective is currently running a flash fiction writing competition as part of Chorlton Arts Festival: you have until midnight today (Friday 27 April) to enter! Full details here: http://flashmobmcr.wordpress.com/
The thinking is that 1Care should be offered free without any contribution by the employers and employees.
The forum I belong to Prim Pals is having an anniversary giveaway. And this one is a really good one ladies!!! And I am not just saying that either. It really is. Here is what it includes:
Here are some snippets of the team's creations:
Something has always felt slightly off in Meghan’s life, ever since her father disappeared before her eyes when she was six. She has never quite fit in at school…or at home.
We found out today that we will be stationed in Malmstrom AFB located in Great Falls, Montana. Not our first (or second, or third or fourth) choice, but we are excited about it. Great mountain bike trails for Jared, lots of awesome horse stuff for Emma, and from what I can see, lots of creative and crafty opportunities for the mama.
For the remaining veggies, just slice ‘em the way you like for sandwiches. I used my trusty mandolin and did the cukes on the bias and very thin. Also, make sure to buy English cucumber for these, the kind that comes with the cellophane covering it. You can eat the skins on this variety, and they’re seedless, which makes for a better overall sandwich experience. I did the same for the jalapeños. For the cilantro, I just rinsed it well and left the leaves whole. The scallions can be chopped.
The bad news is that most, if not all of us, can easily exhibit one or more of these behaviors. For example, what we see as persistence can easily be perceived by your prospect as ‘they waste your time’ and ‘they won’t take no for an answer’. Whose perception do you think is most important?
England was very accommodating for me and my new lens!
There were so many things about Buster that were incredible to us — despite his very common name, he was anything but a common dog. He was a big dog, a mix of two breeds with scary reputations. But wherever he went he made friends — both canine and human. He was never in a real fight in his life, and while he always stood ready to protect his yard and his house, he also loved to climb up on the sofa and lie with his head in my lap.
NOW, THEREFORE, I, BARACK OBAMA, President of the United States of America, by virtue of the authority vested in me by the Constitution and the laws of the United States, do hereby proclaim April 22 through April 28, 2012, as National Crime Victims’ Rights Week. I call upon all Americans to observe this week by participating in events that raise awareness of victims’ rights and services, and by volunteering to serve victims in their time of need.
And so the end of another year is just about here, and despite what the gods have thrown at me I would like just to say to them "I’m still alive you cunts!"
Churlishness, though. At a time when the likes of Battleship are considered acceptable as a major summer release, the intelligence, humour, and evident love for both its source material and basic storytelling that The Avengers displays throughout is not much less than a tonic for the soul. Marvel Studios can look forward to massive box-office success, Joss Whedon can look forward to his new status as a bona fide major-league player, and we can look forward to the next wave of movies featuring these characters. There’s one other superhero movie coming out this summer that’s carrying a huge burden of expectation (and possibly pitching for a more mature audience, too) but that looks likely to be a rather more sombre and thoughtful affair. In terms of general crowd-pleasing spectacle and sheer entertainment value, The Avengers may be the most successful film of this genre to date.
Download and check it out for yourself. I bet you can find a couple of posts just off those dates you can write about. In fact, you can write about them right away and schedule them. Your readers will have fun and marvel at how you are so on top of the holidays and seasons.
*sunsets
How did that happen? I would submit that the ideology of nutritionism deserves as much of the blame as the carbohydrates themselves do–that and human nature. By framing dietary advice in terms of good and bad nutrients, and by burying the recommendation that we should eat less of any particular actual food, it was easy for the take-home message of the 1977 and 1982 dietary guidelines to be simplified as follows: Eat more low-fat foods. And that is precisely what we did. We’re always happy to receive a dispensation to eat more of something (with the possible exception of oat bran), and one of the things nutritionism reliably gives us is some such dispensation: low-fat cookies then, low-carb beer now. It’s hard to imagine the low-fat/high-carb craze taking off as it did or our collective health deteriorating to the extent that it has if McGovern’s original food-based recommendation had stood: Eat less meat and fewer dairy products. For how do you get from that stark counsel of the idea that another carton of Snackwell’s is just what the doctor ordered? (50-51)
For Home, Western man will meet each stranger (friendly or not) with the fierce protective spirit of Lioness guarding her young and an expression that says, tread carefully, for you walk now upon all that I hold dear!
The other mother, is just as busy. Yet she welcomes the season she is in. She doesn't always like doing certain things around the home, but she has trained herself to learn to enjoy them. To see the purpose in them. She is diligent. She sees that the only place she could or would ever desire to be in within the four walls of her own home. She loves to be there. Is often tired and over-whelmed as well, but seeks to never be bored or idle. The over-whelming feeling she has stems from the joy and passion she has for the gift God has given her. The title of mother. How big a job! How glorious a journey! One she craves to do well in. She delights in every second she has with her children. Wanting to freeze every moment with them in time, never to forget them. Nothing is sweeter to her than the late night feedings with her sweet newborn. Oh how she would receive dozens more little ones if the Lord would allow. She teaches her children to help. Knowing that even though it is more work in the beginning, the fruit she and they will reap later in life will be eternal. She looks at everything her hands touch from an eternal perspective. And does not desire to piddle her time away on things that will not produce meaningful fruit for the Lord and her family. She greets each morning with excitement, even though some days it is only in faith. She is understanding of the mission she has been given. She too is in a war-zone. But it never enters the sanctuary of her home. Her home is a place of peace, industry, love and vision. But not her vision. She knows that she was not created to have a vision separate from her family. The vision carried out, is that of her husband. Even when she is nervous or overwhelmed, she works very hard to not let it get in the way of what her husband does. She seeks to free up his time so that he can tend to what matters the Lord is calling him to. She knows that in doing this, she is serving the Lord. For she knows she is never the front runner of her family. And she is perfectly content with her role. Whether her husband is starting a business or traveling for work, she is up for the challenge. She is very wise with her time and the time she spends out of her home. When she leaves her home, she is equipped with a smile and her children in tow. Always ready to give others an answer for the hope that lies within her. Even when she is standing alone, she sticks to her convictions and her family vision. When she is older, she knows that she welcomed all that God had for her and she knows that she cherished every moment she was given.
e la temperatura era delizosamente tiepida
"Season Of The Witch" by Donovan
That sentence suggests that the reader is talking to other parents with young children. And in a magazine read by parents with young children the reader will be able to identify with this - indeed, the reader will probably feel that this writer is 'one of them' and knows what she's talking about. However, the publication targeted was not one read predominantly by parents with young children, but older parents whose children have flown the nest.
In any case, this started an obsession with making ice cream cakes (most of them Hello Kitty cakes). Although now that we have two kids, ice cream cakes have fallen to the bottom of my to-do list when it comes to baking. They just take so long! And they are high maintenance, mainly because you have to constantly return the cake to the freezer several times in between piping, in order to keep the ice cream layer from melting. Not to mention the complications with transporting an ice cream cake!
*** The newly hired NPCs are: Cage (Ftr 2), who follows Yor, Abbideck (Dwf 1), Dunsdonger (Ftr 2), Fozton Sarabekian (Rodian 1), Flipwayter (Dwf 2) and Claude the Ranger (Ranger 3), all of whom follow Uncle Junkal.
The story is also very strong. Simple, yet detailed to create significant meaning. Equal parts tragic and funny, this is one of the best origin stories around. At the end of the movie, there is room for sequels, but it doesn’t feel cheap. This is a very satisfying first chapter in a bigger story. If they were to never make another movie, I would be happy enough. At its heart are characters that are fully fleshed out, and create an interesting journey into the beginning of being hero’s and villains. There are things to learn from this movie, but it’s never forced down your throat.
I hope you can join us for the challenge.
Link the two together, and what have you got? An easy way of making money quickly! Well, it would be easy if nobody else knew about the technique. The trouble is that hundreds of thousands of people are well aware of this technique to make money, and as a result, lots of ads exist for most worthwhile keywords. If an advertisement is already listed for the keyword that you want to list for, then you must be prepared to pay more per click than that advertiser to get your advertisement listed, and then the costs of advertising ramp up.
EXCERPT/SNIPPET
ATTORNEY: You forget? Can you give us an example of something you forgot?
I had never had sauerkraut until today. I have to be honest. Off the fork to the mouth...it was terrible. Well, maybe not terrible. But it wasn't good. Mixed in my soup, well, that's another story. It added a wonderful flavor.
We bake our shoestring potatoes instead of deep-frying them because after a certain age your tummy starts to protest too much fat and oil. But don't worry. These fries are still tender-crispy and delicious. Lining your cookie sheet with parchment paper helps the fries get crisper.
We've been hearing a lot about Hybrid and All-Electric cars with high mileage promises for quite some time now. But looks like finally the long wait is over as one of them succeeds to move from R&D to actual production! Aptera has officially unveiled two vehicles (which look more like mini-planes to me!) that could change the future of automotive design, and is ready to find its place on California streets by end of 2008! Modestly-priced at 26,900(all-electric) and 29,900(plug-in-hybrid), both the Aptera's Typ-1 models are sure to create a buzz, especially as they boast a really attractive mileage figure of 300 miles per charge!!
Another option is to take advantage of these low rates and go with the low 10 year rate at 3.89%. This option would leave you the option of lowering your payment by $200 per month or lowering your amortization again. Your new amortization would be 20.5 years, saving you 4.5 years of mortgage payments. This 10 year mortgage has great benefits as well. Not only are you locked in at a great rate for 10 years, again if you were to change your payment to a bi-weekly rapid payment, on renewal you would have just 8 years left of the mortgage. That again is 22 years of mortgages done in just 15 years.
Do you believe that sex is the ultimate bond between a couple?
I'm sharing a Mother's Day card today. Mom's special day is fast approaching! Gosh, before you know it we will be in the midst of summer!!!! Yay!
Raspberry
“Well, yes,” she replied cautiously, “but I didn’t think it was a medical term.”
“Maybe he’s pissed off at me,” Ran-Hanuel said.
Everyone has bad days, yells at his or her spouse, or is downright selfish. Despite these imperfections, God created the husband and wife to steer each other in His direction.
Come on over to Squigglefly blogspot and join in this fun challenge. You can grab a freebie at the store or purchase one you particularly like or use one you have on hand. In any event, get it on your blog, and come on over and drop off a link to your blog. If you do not have a blog, just let Holly know at the blog site. Her email is there.
A new comprehensive study published in EnvironmentalHealthPerspectives looked at 66,203 mother and child pairs. The study indicated that maternal stress is related to a variety of pediatric diseases, such as infectious and parasitic diseases; mental and behavioral disorders; and diseases of the ear, eye, skin, respiratory system, digestive system, musculoskeletal system, and genitourinary system. Some limitations to the study include the fact that other issues that could provoke stress in mothers, such as poverty or work place stressors, can also be to blame for the ailments in the children. The study also did not look at the timing of the mother’s stress during the pregnancy as a factor.
Refusals to License Intellectual Property: Testing the Limits of Law and Economics
In India osteoarthritis ie degenerative arthritis which affects the knee is more prevalent in the country with every third person above the age of 70 years affected, , the incidence of rheumatoid arthritis is little less than in the West.
Yes, I miss so clearly seeing those marching to different drumbeats. And I miss Miss Elta’s three-layer German Chocolate Cake. C
1 day there. I'm aiming at hitting most of the best bars and breweries, if I can!
Sefira is both a joyous and mournful time. As we happily anticipate Matan Torah, we mourn the passing of the students of Rabbi Akiva. Why did they die specifically during this time period? The Hegyonei Halacha explains that to properly prepare for receiving the Torah, a person must work on his middot. Indeed there is a custom to study Pirkei Avot during sefira. We need to think about why we are in aveilut, internalize the reason, and work to rectify our failings. The Gemara writes that the students died because they did not properly respect each other. These seven weeks are an opportune time to work on our relationships bein adam l’chavero.
I've gone Etsy crazy lately. EVERYTHING is on there. Seriously! I've started getting my jewelry findings on there. Because my friend doesn't read my blog, I feel it's safe to post these.
On my way to a swap the other day, I realized I had forgotten scissors. When I stopped to get a pair at a Dollar General store, I found some plain white mini journals. How perfect for altering!! So, I bought several and have gifted a few so far.
At this point in David’s career he was not a leader who simply sent out men into battle. David was a leader who fought in person.
and my fear is naked”
ECM Libra ended trading at 90.5 sen, inching up 0.5 sen.
However, there is one sound it can never muffle – the sound of a woman screaming: “Get the anaethestist back NOW!”
What have you read recently that you really loved?
can you see how bent it is on the picture?!
The basil, tomato and cheese was super easy. I bought sliced boccocini cheese, sliced tomatoes and cucumbers, put them all together in a stack and sprinkled them with basil and a bit of olive oil.
Genesis
It’s a common enough saying in Spain — also used when playing video games à la “suck it!” — but when I asked Anne what the French equivalent was, she said she’d have to think about it since nothing came to mind easily. Until I hear otherwise, I’m going to believe that the French are too bien élevé to revel in such schadenfreude.
Author: Vladimir Nabokov
Random Thoughts: Bacon would be delicious in this.
I really liked it!
Cynthia Giugliano, 46, Nesconset, N.Y.
B. Elementary Platen Press Work by Ralph W. Polk: Any and all printing manuals will find a prominent place on my bookshelf for easy referencing. This book is specific to the platen press but I'm pretty sure there are details and methods that can be loosely transferred to other presses. No matter what stage a printer is at, going back to the basics is a good idea.
“Because they’re permanently hard and easier to clean,” replies one of the women tartly. “Lesbians don’t hate penises anyway. They just don’t find them exciting when they’re attached to the body of a man.”
And turned around to see a moose standing some yards away, staring at us with what seemed to be an air of perplexity. He tossed his head a little and started walking towards us.
This is how they look on my wall.
What foods do you crave? How do you stay within your number? Let’s be honest here. I crave french fries, pizza and ice cream! I tell my guy all the time that there is no one on earth who loves fried foods more than I do! But with that said, I also have a crazy love for healthy foods! I can’t imagine a day without fruits and vegetables! (I also tell my guy all the time that fruit makes me feel alive, he rolls his eyes at me frequently). So before I learned about “my number” I always maintained a comfortable weight because my love for junk and my love for health food provided a good enough balance. When I learned about my number it all fell into place! Finally a lifestyle choice that I could embrace and respect: do not eliminate your favorite foods, but take responsibility for what you eat, and plan ahead! Staying within my number requires planning and mindfullness!
of firewood came in cold and left as light, smoke, ash.
Satisfied the eviction had been successfully carried out the Happy Farmer once again lit the Aga and was a tad disgruntled when fumes began bellowing out of the ovens like never before. The whole house was 'gassed' out. More roof top clambering and chimney sweeping, and another huge nest was dislodged from further down the pipe.
Really sorry all for being awol for so long – I had some work issues to sort and just needed some time away. Also one of my work colleagues discovered my blog which made me consider closing it L Anyway if you are reading colleague – please don’t tell anyone that this is me. I would appreciate that. K x
seduced to follow a new warrior’s quest
Micro by Michael Crichton and Richard Preston (audio)
Not too long? Well certainly an earlier post than usual for me (OH home sick, so he can look after the youngest whilst I sit at the computer).
Le Morte d’Arthur – Mallory
I've linked Karen's frosting recipe above - she has several video tutorials on her web site. I also like the tutorials for icing consistency from Ali Bee. I LOVE video tutorials - I'm definitely a person who likes to see how to do things in action! I found her method of thinning with a spray bottle of water to be so much more controlled and better and getting a good consistency than any other way I've done it. I didn't use the squirt bottle of water for the batch of frosting for the starfish...and I got it a bit too runny - overflows! I learned my lesson and got the squirt bottle for everything else. Soooo much easier to control. I also find working in small bowls in small batches to be the best way to get good icing consistency. I never think I'm going to have enough...and I almost always have too much! The small squeeze bottles were superb for decorating the details.
Fenugreek seeds are used as a herb in Traditional Chinese Medicine which warms and tonifies kidneys, disperses cold and alleviates pain.
Resections are more painful. You have the external cut and the internal one vying for attention.
But that she was going to fix it.
I finished the morning out in the kitchen baking 6 caramel, 1coconut,1chocolate,2 pound and 2 wine cakes.
To assemble, spread each bread slice with a generous amount of hummus. Top with a slather of olive tapenade then a slice each of eggplant and peppers.
What I will say is this though: this is utter, utter rubbish and I would implore you not to listen to it.
I could now breathe once more and the adrenaline rush got me working into producing my next handmade card, courtesy of my aunt's sentiments.
36. Sharing tea and tea time.
Never the less. I'm here today to share this card with you.
On Friday, the second day after the coup, however, Captain Sanogo began to adopt some new elements into his wardrobe. In the image below, he wears the same uniform, beret, pin and white t-shirt, but there’s something else visible as well, brown in color, between his t-shirt and his fatigues.
So I jumped into action, saw that tickets were still available here but that the Wednesday-night show in New York had already sold out! In other words: move quickly! So I did and ended up seeing an excellent show.
In this way you put your “old man” on the cross, and put on the “new man” in Christ yielding yourself to Him in everything, yoking yourself to Him so that your life is no longer yours but His! Praised be His Glorious Name!
This article tries to tell some of the reasons why and how these reasons might be helpful to other advisors in evaluating their practice.
But back to Jen. In Left Jen is in every scene. She is the narrator. We watch her. We hear her. And no one wants to spend that amount of time in the head of one person and them not be interesting and there’s nothing more interesting that different. We love seeing weird animals on TV and we love weird people. Here’s how Jen describes herself:
THIS IS THE FUTURE!
February is about to end… and so new schedules will be up… mixed up… including off would be changed… so we don’t know, how long this little club we got going gonna last… but hey, it’s good while it is lasting…
The room was a mess and it didn’t have a telephone book where we could call other hotels. We had to find our way with our mobile phones that were dying and the room didn’t have enough outlets. We even walked around to see any restaurants near that we felt comfortable walking back to the hotel in the dark. After everything went under for us we made up this lie to get back to the airport so we could get our deposit back. We ate at the airport after not eating since early that morning and found a room near the airport that thankfully had shuttle service to the Port of Miami and a continental breakfast.
Ok, guys, the winner of the Multiplication Pumpkin Patch is #12, Shanon Banks! Congrats! Email me your address at tabitha@flapjacklapbooks.com.
The advance booking is paid 30% of total value
Towards the end of our day our table was crowded by the Group C line, with folks trying to buy our beer, or trade line tickets for bottles, and things got a bit uncomfortable - our cue to go watch High on Fire. We took in a few songs, and headed back to our parking lot and a park bench to talk over the day. A good day, as expected.
Hansel and Grettel, Little Red Riding Hood, the Three Little Pigs and some other characters you’ve probably never heard of spent the evening wondering around a makeshift storybook land.
Delirium by Lauren Oliver - So good! I almost passed this one up. So glad I didn't!
3/10=Garbage!!
So, as you see from that last little non-food go-together that I threw in, there are so many things that compliment each other and create ’go-together’ togetherness. You can’t help but think of one without the other. We do the same thing when we speak of our family and friends.
Yebol broke down the search into different categories. First, like Google, it had a list of the top websites that came up for Britney. Right under there, it had a cateogory called “news” specially for current events that have happened with Britney and the last time she was in the news. Under there, it included videos of Britney from her music videos. It seemed to be a lot more updated and fresh compared to Google.
It was the first time I felt desire as a clear antidote to death, to my mortality.
Either of those could be true. Heck, both could be. But the one I’ve thought out the most is the one I believe to be the most likely scenario. Using myself as an example, I’ve organized and ran many different things from charity events, to D&D campaigns, to a HeroClix Tournament (Google it). As someone who is very passionate and a bit OCD when it comes to running something, I tend to do it just the way I think it should be. If someone else takes that idea and removes the aspects I think are the heart and soul of it, it bothers me.
need to go to the bank to attain a loan for your house or finance your
He frowned at me and turned away, muttering something in Spanish that sounded like curses.
The support of the man who was Malaysia’s prime minister for two decades indicates DRB’s purchase of the stake — valued at 993 million ringgit ($314 million) at current prices — is imminent because of the former premier’s lingering influence, according to James Ratnam, an analyst at TA Securities Holdings Bhd. Proton would add the owner of the Lotus sports car brand to Syed Mokhtar’s business empire, which includes ports, airports and power plants.
He said he'd get in touch on Facebook about hanging out this week. I thought he might not--he still seems rather entangled with his ex--but he messaged me today. He said Tuesday is his only weeknight without work (pizza delivery) or a class (he's taking classes on homesteading and raising chickens and such, I guess in case of an apocalypse). He invited me to an auction (I had expressed an interest in going to one sometime). I'm looking forward to it... and hoping to make out with him some more, too.
named William who was the last
4. Accumulate information about the financial impact of the abuse on the Church.
I did a course in October with Astrid Reidel which I mentioned in last weeks blog and made Murrini for the first time. I have not had a chance to experiment with them so this was the week and I am hooked!
Knots are tied and knots unraveled
I'm still breastfeeding in the morning & at night. I will keep this up until my supply completely disappears. But I can tell he's upset when I come home for lunch or get off work & don't breastfeed him, the screaming & glaring gives it away.
The experience changed my mind drastically.
It was so fantastic to see the film with the fans, with the people who understand. The energy was wonderful! At the end, we gave her a standing ovation, then she thanked us all for coming and headed out pretty quickly so she could personally thank everyone as they walked out.
The Pyrenees, France and Spain. Back to Europe because the alps cover too much ground to try and ride in one tour unless you have a lot of time. The French and Spanish alps are said to be less touristy and better to ride than the traditional alpine areas. I think if you ride the other off season then that argument may be void. However watching Le Tour each year I nearly drool looking at the roads in this area and have been known to talk out loud to myself while viewing Le Tour saying something like “goddam I must ride that road”
What if there was a way where you could buy your friends cheap drinks at anytime of the night for prices even cheaper than what you'd pay during happy hour? The new app called Bartab is the self-proclaimed "Home of the $1 drinks" and allows you to buy drinks for yourself and your friends from any mobile device using Facebook, for only $1. That's right. You can buy your real friends, real drinks for only a dollar.
Professor John Turley, a US academic, writes: “The Obama Administration has taken the rare step of criticizing a British court. Why? Because the court released a few paragraphs of a report that confirmed our abuse and torture of detainees. Spokesman Ben LaBolt denounced the release of the information and threatened to cut off access of the British to classified information in the future. Note these paragraphs do not appear to reveal any new classified technique, but rather confirm our violations of international law — evidence that the Obama Administration has been refusing to release.
CIC IS AL QAEDA FRANCHISE
2. One method that they have for getting away with it is a practice known as “bundling”, where instead of giving libraries the choice of which journals they want to subscribe to, they offer them the choice between a large collection of journals (chosen by them) or nothing at all. So if some Elsevier journals in the “bundle” are indispensable to a library, that library is forced to subscribe at very high subscription rates to a large number of journals, across all the sciences, many of which they do not want. (The journal Chaos, Solitons and Fractals is a notorious example of a journal that is regarded as a joke by many mathematicians, but which libraries all round the world must nevertheless subscribe to.) Given that libraries have limited budgets, this often means that they cannot subscribe to journals that they would much rather subscribe to, so it is not just libraries that are harmed, but other publishers, which is of course part of the motivation for the scheme.
'As you can imagine I’m devastated, heartbroken. I’ve been in bits for the past few days. When you share an intimate moment with someone that you love and you care about and trust you never imagine for one minute that that footage may at any point be shared with the rest of the UK or even people around the world. So as you can imagine it’s a pretty tough time for me, but I don’t feel that I should be the one to take the heat for it or the stick. This is something that he took upon himself to put online... and he’s now sitting in silence pretending it’s not him on the tape, when it is.'Mr Edwards also used Twitter to respond to Tulisa's accusations. He tweeted: 'To find the truth both sides of the story should be heard b4 passing judgement thatisall'. Then a short while later he also tweeted: 'I believe in silence being a sign of integrity but in this case I guess I'll have to speak up and Lay out the facts and let you guys decide'.
to use in my own collage work
Phase II (in progress 2012):
i've never tried anything, not really. i know i'm one of those people who would end up needing it to get out of bed. and i think for me, doppler use would be the same thing.
As always the Dice vendor is great if you need any, though having a collection of stunning D6′s from a few years past I opted not to get, but i always enjoy looking. I did end up on the neibhoring booth buying something from Grammar Matters, a shirt about Pairs/Pears. It was either that or Uncle Jack and that just went into weird weird venues that I wasn’t sure was Sutable to wear anywhere. So I went with the other one, I like Pears anyways.
Music Player (MP3, WAV & eAAC+)
Divorce went from a necessary evil to a positive good almost overnight”. Promiscuous sex outside of marriage was seen as a major component of “freedom” by proponents of sexual liberation. And as one would expect, such behavior led to a large number of “unwanted pregnancies.”
In some sites before hitting the submit button user needs to accept terms and conditions. Submit button can either be disabled or an error message shown if terms and conditions are not accepted.
Now for the WINNER!! I used Random.org to find the lucky person and the winner is...............Patriotic Mom. Congratulations!! Please send me your email and I will get with you about your gameboard.
Hey guys! This is a little bit of an unconventional set up for Friday Favorites but I was feeling extra passionate about this combo so I decided it was ok.
Heaped on with the songs that disgust.
Instead of going in the theatre like good little guests we made the choice to stay with the celebrities and CBC executives, casts and crews and this afforded us the opportunity to stand at the edge of the red carpet and photograph all of the comings and goings of the CBC stars. We saw and met many of the most popular Canadians from the best television shows on the air today.
After looking over healthy suggestions for food I kept seeing lentils, so I thought I'd give them a try this week.
My eyes were definitely more dramatic than I’ve ever worn, but I chose to purchase the Dark Rite cream eyeshadow pencil. I’m not sure I could/would replicate what he did for a regular night out, but it’s super easy to use and to blend! I’m excited to play around with it : )
Jesus was someone you wanted to be around. He would make you uncomfortable in his presence until you repented and followed God. But once honest with yourself and God you could find no more contentment or peace than in his company.
FAVOURITE PLACE: Kepala Batas, my hometown
Contestant: Erm…
The problem was 1. No "street" lights - we were waaaaay up Green Mountain 2. The "turns" were not so much turns as they were Nascar style 90degree angles 3. No street signs, and I won't even get into the boulders that were left there to punish wayward drivers.
black fish kissing
New Big Prinz – The Fall
Pages: 343
corriander leaves few
Aren't you happy I warned you. You should really pay me for telling you that piece of advice. It could save your life someday. Seriously.
Rhode Island – 28.0 percent, 29.6 percent
The cleat consists of two pieces:
You have no idea how much I laugh at that scene and since then on, no matter how stupid and convenient Code Geass is, I forgive it. I treat Code Geass as some cute little kid who tried very hard but failed. That, I find to be very endearing.
The point of the push poll apparently was to see if the information provided--including leading statements, with incorrect information--would nudge listeners into supporting Boyland, who backs the AY project, against the incumbent, who opposes the AY project.
Thank you to all those people who have sent me words of encouragement and told me that my work makes them feel familiar strange things ... these kind nods lift my fragile self confidence enough to keep me creating. And thank you to these artists whose works make me feel these familiar strange things too.
On November 28 1987, a South African Airways 747-244b aircraft (Aircraft Identification ZS-SAS) with 159 passengers on board crashed into the Indian Ocean, 160 miles north east of Mauritius. All passengers and crew perished.
When I was in high school, my life was scheduled. There was a reason for this: I didn't want to be home if I could possibly avoid it, and I had excellent reasons. My typical after school schedule looked like this:
I seem to have lost my perfectly turned out omelette mojo and they keep on breaking at the seams. I think it's indicative that I've been putting too much strain on our relationship. Perhaps it's time to move on.
· "Kiss Me I'm Irish" buttons will get you nowhere with the ladies.
Comment #290 - Lulu (confirmed)
Have a clear vision and mission for yourself. You shouldn't seek a job for the sake of just having a job. Your vision should be intimately connected to the job you are trying to land. Why? Your passion will be abundantly apparent. You will speak with enthusiasm and confidence. Companies want to hire people who will closely fit into their system. They want to hire people who are passionate, willing to work hard, and be an asset to their company. Be that person.
Other articles stated the Iodine test isn't a true indication of Iodine levels. That Iodine evaporates into the air faster than it soaks into the skin so the "fading" Iodine indicating a low level is actually due to evaporation.
‘Mum, why does your card keep getting blocked?’ – Quote from the 8yo as he struggles to understand my take on financial responsibility.
Timing is so important. I was working on this film for ABC Family, and there is a music producer that we have worked with before and he’s always kind of on our minds but he happened to send us a track on the day we were looking for a top-40 dance track and it sounded exactly like what we wanted. It was such perfect timing and worked out so well, but had he done so two weeks before, it might not have happened. So, part of it is luck, in terms of getting the placement, but as well, it doesn’t hurt to ask. Typically I’ll say to someone, “hey check in next month, if you have some new stuff, or keep me posted on developments.” But the biggest thing I’d recommend is saying, “Hey can you add me to your music request list?” I’m reaching out to people when I need something, so when something comes up, I’ll reach out and I’ll put together a brief, outline the fee, the rights involved, the scene, etc, and I’ll blast that out to people that I think are appropriate. You want to be on that list. You want to stay on that list. At Arpix, that’s how we operate. Anyone else I can’t comment on, but I think it’s a pretty good system.
In March, I took my 2 older children to an expo in our area that explored all things wild, including live animals! There was a scavenger hunt where we had to go to different booths to answer the clues throughout the morning and we sat in on 2 presentations.
She can drink you under the table and she drinks scotch on the rocks. When you have had too many cocktails and are trying to take off your saggy tights she will get down on the floor and yank them off by the toes, (and then display them in your house for you to find the next day.) That is a good friend that can be both helpful and bad at the same time.
The first thing I have to say that I loved was Christy bought us each a Wine Yoke from Best Vineyards Winery. This allowed us to carry our wine glass with no hands which made it easier to enjoy the food stops.
surely won't hurt that she's got a raft of illustrious guest
350 W. 11th Street, Bloomington
In sum, the Court finds that the denial of the instant petition is proper.
One should also consider whether the vast expansion of the war on drugs under Reagan and Clinton put people behind bars who might otherwise be committing crimes. While many nonviolent drug offenders have been caught up in the net of incarceration, the removal of such a large number of people from the general population is bound to have some kind of effect. On one hand, the loss of parents and wage-earners has undoubtedly disrupted families and communities across the country—a shift that might lead to greater rates of crime. On the other hand, the drug war has detained thousands of people who would need jobs, healthcare and housing on the outside, which means they do not show up in measures of crime and unemployment. Mass incarceration, in this view, is a blunt way of putting a lot of potential social problems in a box, albeit a very expensive one—both fiscally, for taxpayers, and personally, for the individuals trapped in it. Imprisonment is surely the most literal expression of Du Bois’s famous line about how it feels “to be a problem.” (The unprecedented growth of the prison population in recent decades is a subject that scholars such as Michelle Alexander, Heather Thompson, and our own Joel Suarez have begun to explore.)
Concerning the lateness of the 2010 Party Accounts being presented to the Electoral Commission, Geoff said the main reason for this was that the new Treasury Dept. appointed in the last 3 months of 2010 had found it difficult to collate the information. He assured those present that the Accounts were almost ready and would be lodged during February. He warned that although they will show a deficit at 31st December, 2010 of a little over £700,000, much of this debt has been cleared. He estimated that the 2011 Accounts would show a vast improvement, and are expected to be presented on time.
4 tablespoons powdered milk (dry milk).
Third Choice – Do you want the rewards of God? Yes or No
This renovation has not been very eco, as I am NOT an expert on eco building materials (yet?) and mostly my Dad was in charge! Also, there have been some considerations: not-so-very-strong walls and balcony mean that light (not heavy) materials need to be used. So polycarbonate was recommended to us.
And they didn’t even tell us we needed all of this stupid stuff for our uniforms until the day before we started!!! They knew we were going to be hired for at least a week before we started. Having a fever and hopping from bus to bus trying to find all of these stupid uniform pieces is kind of infuriating (yay being sick).
ashobho meye – uncultured, indecent girl
05.15: Zakk, Bremen, Germany
Seen a bad movie? Camping tips?
As you would expect, I'm literally clawing at my taint to explain how LOLA works. Nevertheless, before I do that, I'd like to introduce you Laura (Jennifer Cornish) and Brad (Paul Miklas), two petty criminals who plan on kidnapping Mr. Sandawn (George T. Cunningham), some sort of bigwig (his wig is so big they named the building after him). Why are you introducing us to these wankers? Well, you see, in the film's opening scene, just as Brad is about to call his partner in crime (the garbage bags hastily strewn about the phone booth he enters are meant to illustrate that he lives and/or hangs out in the shady, dilapidated part of town just outside of town), Laura can be seen standing in front of a full-length mirror. Yeah, so, lots of people look at themselves in the mirror before they leave their place of residence, it's called having self-respect. You didn't let me finish, señor dingus. As she's standing there, she reaches down and runs both her hands up the shapely, nylon-encased circumference of her right leg. Making sure there are no creases or crinkles present in the lavender, no-nonsense pantyhose lurking below and underneath her grey pencil skirt (the modest slits, one in the front and one in the back, allow the wearer to navigate an office environment with a greater sense of ease and comfort), the sight of Laura enjoying the sturdiness of her hosiery-adorned legs was an absolute joy.
Is that the biggest geomagnetic storm on record?
by Yuichi Yokoyama, 2004
And that’s what we harness when we write. We join our wordsmithery to the shared meanings and emotions and experiences in the mind and heart of our reader. We cross the void between two minds and truly connect. When we recognise the inner synaesthete in ourselves and our reader, and harness it, there’s no limit to the power of language. And that, in a nutshell is what Mondays are Red is “about”, as Luke discovers the infinite power of language.
My 2-year-old daughter Berry has quite the personality and being the third child, she seems to have picked up the seriousness of Stewie, and the goofiness of Linus. This was her conversation with a member of this urban family today when she whipped open the bathroom door and found them on the toilet.
Sure, taking snapshots is just plain fun. But for the full fun effect, add an effect and see eight new versions of you. Twist up your face, double your head, or make yourself look like an alien, a comic book character, or an X-ray. On the big iPad display, there’s big fun in your face. And lots of quirky and freaky, too.
These cups would look gorgeous mixed together... sometimes different patterns of china make the best table settings... I would also mix them in with the plain white Pillivuyt that I have...
And still have the capacity to exceed possibilities
Last but not least, who will manage your social media accounts on a daily basis? The popular choice is to hand this responsibility off to a younger staff member who uses Facebook regularly, but that’s not always a good idea. Just because someone spends a lot of time on social media doesn’t mean they will use it properly. I’d suggest picking someone who understands social media but also has excellent customer service and marketing skills. You may want to consider paying an outside firm if you don’t feel you have those skills available to you on your staff.
four middle-aged white guys
I just adore the new Editor, Mary Forsell,
I'd do so much you'd be surprised,
The base of the salad is a bag of mixed leaves. On top of the leaves I scattered chopped chicken, crisply cooked bacon, chopped avocado, a segmented orange, diced red pepper and some sliced red onions.
Brookly Brewery - Monster Ale. This is a beer I really like. When we made the beer trade, Brooklyn Brewery was the only brewery that I requested he send to me. I can't get it in Arizona. I would have been happy with anything he sent me, but a barley wine moved him into my inner circle. I'm really enjoying this. It says 12 Fl. oz and 10.1 abv. That sounds like a good time. Trust me, it is. But you would never know it. There is zero taste of alcohol like some other barleywines. It has a great taste and a smooth mouth feel. If you were a rookie, you could drink 2 or 3 of these before you realized you were in trouble. It leans against the malt side of the fence so I am enjoying it. Of all the beers Brian sent me, this is one of my favorites so far. Grade - 4 Burps
their bed become the sea-floor forest
sideways
the color i used on my gossip bench was matte and i didn't have a ton of luck with poly before.
Hello everyone, welcome to another Monday Bitten by the Bug 2 challenge. This week's challenge cut was selected by my fabulously British design team sister, Julie. Julie chose for the design team to use any flourish from the Cindy Loo cartridge. In that Easter is just around the corner I thought this was a perfect time to break out an Easter card.
We called each other when we needed someone to pull us from the brink of disaster (physical or emotional). “I’m making flower arrangements for the graduation reception. They suck.” I’d shout into the phone. Then I’d break into my signature pathetic whine, “Can you come over?” No matter what else she was doing, she’d come over and fix it. And I’d do the same for her. When an acquaintance mistook us for sisters, we were delighted. Neither of us had ever had a sister– until now.
As for the Hizbollah, which has repeatedly promised that Israelis will pay for their killing of Lebanese civilians, its revenge cannot be long in coming. Operation Grapes of Wrath may then turn out to be all too aptly named.
To everybody reading this and celebrating today... Happy Thanksgiving! We are so grateful to count you as our friend. Thanks for sharing this experience with us!
Micah - Sew pajama eaters and clothes for people
I have mixed feelings about Civil Rights Inc.. and its efforts to bring this case to the forefront. On one hand, if not for those efforts, the case may not have received national attention. On the other hand, it has set the Country up for more division and will do little to solve any of the real social and legal issues surrounding the case. I see this case heading for the category of spectacle. Just add a tent and some clowns and you have a huge circus. It's just going to turn into infotainment that the networks will gin up for ratings, playing one part of the citizenry against another. Sadly, no real social issues are likely to be solved as a result of this case. Moreover, in practical terms, the Martin family may not get "justice". The case is just unbelievably flawed.
He's got a point. A fabulous arse is a great ice-breaker. Whenever my old friend Smacker Ramrod saw an attractive woman at a party, he used to circumnavigate her discreetly before attempting to make conversation. A clear mental picture of her posterior helped him find the right words and focus on the task at hand. Some may call such behaviour sexist, but let us acknowledge a simple truth: most women would rather have their bottom admired than listen to a lot of guff about the price of oil or the G-12 summit. I’m sure that’s even true of female politicians like Hilldog and Frau Merkel.
Real headline: Wear Your Pajamas All Day?
Personal weapons?
So it’s up to you. Show you care about this country or continue hitting Romney. Your choice.
Spaten Oktoberfest Ur-Marzen has a grainy smell in the bottle and pours a light tea color with a weak head and medium beading in the glass. The taste is vaguely of roasted nuts with a quick caramel finish. While I’m happy and proud that the allies kicked the snot out of a nation of people who allowed the Holocaust to take place I’m also glad the Reinheitsgebot remains in effect; this beer’s a keeper.
repeatedly coming up empty, but for a fist of soil
Be sure to visit the ODBD Blog on Feb. 1 to see the full release and participate in the hop, for lots of chances to WIN! Hope to see you then!!!
When lovely woman wants a favor,
"the con job"
Santa, please don’t bring me another cell phone!
Petitioner filed a petition for certiorari with the Court of Appeals which denied the petition on August 31, 2004. It held that the Ombudsman committed no grave abuse of discretion in its appreciation of the evidence against respondents. Petitioner moved for reconsideration but was denied on February 21, 2005.
1 whole Red Bell Pepper, Julienned
I chose Stinky because of the writing and because of the illustrations. Obviously, but what does that mean?
Phew..that was kind of a marathon post...but my kids are at CCD and the Teacher is at Lowe's so it's nice and quiet this Sunday morning.
I'm totally going to learn to garden when we ever get into a house!
There was nothing, no sound, simply numbness. John watched small things happen around him - a fly ambling on the carpet, Scally greedily snuffling and grunting at the gap at the bottom of the closed bedroom door, the steam from his mother's teacup - and swiftly realized he would feel like this for a while: things would happen to him before he could happen to things again.In that restrained atmosphere it is a while before he can properly give rein to his emotions, the moment eventually coming courtesy of something innocuous, the label on a jar of redcurrant jelly written in his father's hand and the first tears of a long weekend. John's brother Borys has driven down to the house with his wife and infant child and the two brothers can compare their very different views on the father they shared. To a greater or lesser extent we all return to a childlike state when we spend time with our siblings, unable to avoid whatever pecking order existed back then and Borys laments what he never had, the thing he saw given so freely to John - a proper father.
Police station commander, director Andre Wiese of the Lyttelton police station, said at that time that the citizen's policing-forum members who went into hot pursuit in cooperation with the police patrols, have probably saved the lives of many. He praised them for their courage.
Political fighting with someone who has the opposite beliefs from you
Summer is here and there is an abundance of fruit everywhere. India is known for it's yummilicious mangoes in the summer and you have over a 100 varieties available in the country. If I am obsessed about baking and cooking with strawberries my love for Mangoes cannot be left far behind. I have grown up on staple diet of luscious orangey Alphonso Mangoes and just can't resist picking up some when I am at a fruit vendors. Previously, I did the following Mango posts Mango Cream Cake , Mango Shrikhand, Mango Yogurt Mousse , Mango Panna , Mangoes & Cream Ice cream .
Of course, I do need a job. Or, to be exact, I need an income. So I still have a bit of a problem. But I’m not freaking out about it, and I’m back to feeling at peace with my adopted homeland and its impossible-for-me-to-learn language. What a freakin’ relief! I can tackle my job problem from a clearer, calmer position, and that’s a very good thing.
c) sell the Goodwill ottoman on Craigslist and make a profit.
Thursday, 5/3: I’ve got a dress rehearsal, so I’m leaving a quick and easy favorite — antipasto pasta salad, using the Jovial brand of brown rice pasta we’ve come to enjoy in the past few weeks.
Spring is teasing us with some warm sunny days and some cloudy, rainy, cold days, so want to surround myself with flowers. I made this card for my mom for Mothers' Day. I used my Build A Bouquet stamp set from Our Craft Lounge. I am having so much fun with this set (yes, my last post I also used this same set). But look how different a color can make. I also used my cricut storybook cartridge for the vine and flourish. I am entering this in several challenges this week. Items I used to make this card: Cuttlebug swiss dot embossing folder, Cricut Storybook cartridge, a plain doily, CTMH Heavenly Blue and Grape Sherbet (discontinued colors) ink., misc papers from my stash, bling and a CLEAR stickpin from my friend Linda.
3. Add snow peas and stir-fry for 30 seconds
N o weapon that is known
Well I don’t know about you, but my little iPhone hacking toddler will be handwriting and drawing a letter to his Nana & Paw Paw this evening after he finishes his Super Why reading app game on the iPad.
and many works from other artists that depict scenes from or were inspired by his books.
27. "Pipe pics" are never REALLY appreciated in the way you fantasize them to be.
Update: apparently this was the fruit of Grover Norquist's demented anti-genius. He's so petrified of the spectre of anything anyone could possibly characterize as a "tax increase" that he's stomping about, defending distortive corporate-welfare abominations like the ethanol "tax credit". Norquist's Americans for Tax Reform is an abscess on the conservative movement, a corruption. The best construction to place upon his organization's activities is that they've slid from pro-capitalist tax reform to pro-big-business tax-credit farming. A more likely construction is that he was always in this for the lobbying opportunities, and that his little cottage industry is built upon lobbying and rent-seeking under the color of "tax reform".
Fixing Information Consumption & User Experience Online
It's a bunch of paper from Bo Bunny! And maaaaaaybe a few other surprise goodies as well from my stash of treasures...
Preheat oven to 375 (at this temperature, you'll have to bake it a relatively long time, probably 45 minutes, but I chose to do it at that temperature so it could bake along with the squash; if you're in a hurry and this is all you're baking you can put the oven up to 425 and it will probably only take 20 minutes or so).
There’s another response too. I think this response is from the Pharisees and Lawyers who had previously gathered around Jesus preventing the man from getting to close. The Scripture says: They were ecstatic, but not in our sense. It means they were dumbfounded; they sort of stared off into space with a sort ‘duh’ look on their faces. They didn’t know what to make of what happened: either the forgiveness or the healing. They were also filled with ‘awe’ or in Greek phobos which means literally ‘fear.’
**If you’re snickering, it doesn’t mean what you think it means. And I’m not the Royals Rule! Kind of Anglophile, either—I’m more of a literary fangirl and BBC worshipper . . .
It hasn't got as much on as I'd like - this is because I broke my toe when I was right in the middle of making it. By walking into a wall. And I hadn't even had a drink. I blame it on the fact that I turned 40 a couple of weeks ago! Now slamming your toe that hard into a wall does hurt quite a lot and really doesn't help your scrapping mojo so to me it looks a little unfinished.
I will state from the outset that I'm a big Woody Allen fan. I haven't seen all of his movies, or even a majority of them, but I still connect with them for some reason. Maybe it's the uneasiness with which he (or his "characters") seem to move through life. Or maybe it's the obscure references he's constantly making throughout his films that I find amusing, and even a little educational (I usually am looking them up throughout the movie).
Well, since I find stories without an ending an irritation (and the News is very often guilty of this, perhaps reinforcing our increasingly short attention span), I thought I would update you on my most recent Customer Service grouches.
My other favorite parts I hope to write about later, and they included Muffin's for Mom at my kids' school on Friday morning and my daughter's first dance recital.
this young?
Someone to laugh with you at everything and nothing (predominantly nothing, it sometimes seems).
So, I’ve just dropped Molly off at the vet for ‘tests’.
Anna Aspnes: Descriptive Word Transfers No1
What?? You don't know what Rosella Jam is!?! It's an old Aussie recipe that is made from the fleshy red calyx (kind of a mix of fruit and flower) and bracts that are around the seed of the Wild Rosella bush. There are many differents forms of recipe for making Rosella Jam although the traditional one can be found HERE although I think THIS or THIS looks easier!! When I asked about making Rosella Jam I was simply told -
Reader, did I answer "Look, dollface the attitude's unprofessional, and you can quit with the personal remarks right now"?
They found that tears would boil in the black
Tazawako Beer has been one of the best beer breweries of Japan. Tazawako Beer was established in 1994, soon after the alleviation of Liquor Tax Act, which opened up another direction of business interest for Warabi-za Theater Company. They took a great interest in the brewery culture that has a long tradition in many countries and also focused on using ingredients produced only in Akita Prefecture--- becoming the very first beer brewery in Akita Prefecture.
and outrageous outfits.
At 20 months, McKinley is talking a ton! It seems like a light bulb just clicked this last month and she is now trying to talk all the time and say everything! She can pretty much say anything she wants to say! She is even putting ideas together and using small sentences. The other day we went out for ice cream and McKinley looked at the empty bowl and said, "ice cream, all gone!" She's starting to put words and ideas together more and more! Whenever we tell her that we're going to see Mya, she goes through all the names of everyone in their family. She says, "Ma (Madison), My My (Mya), Bra (Brad), and Emmy (Emily)." She usually is doing a dance and squealing while she goes through all their names because she is so excited to go and see them! Here she having Mya put some makeup on her :)
2) Pass on your thanks to the person who gave you the award.
Good news was also in store for asking prices, which compared to the previous month of March, increased 0.5 percent in April on a seasonally adjusted basis, according to Trulia, which also noted that asking prices lead sales prices by approximately two or more months.
Malavai Quinn +10 +10
* In all honesty, this stuff had been going on in my life all along, but being in therapy has a way of making you notice things, and therapists have this “obnoxious” habit of pointing things out, publicizing their observations, and generally making you more aware of this kind of thing.
The church should be the most exiting place in town. How can we move into miraculous ministry? First, recognize the necessity of supernatural ministry… Psalm 77:11-14 teaches… “I will remember the works of the Lord” (KJV). Psalm 103:2-3 reminds us to “forget not all His benefits.” The New Testament church was not designed to function on the natural level… 2 Timothy 3:5 tells how a form of godliness had taken over the church. Second, develop an attitude that moving in the miraculous is the will of God. It is not carnal to desire the supernatural. John 14:11-12… “The works that I do shall he do also.” Third, make a decision to pay the price for this powerful ministry… Earnestly seek (Hebrews 11:6, Luke 4:18-19)… Desire the best gifts (1 Corinthians 12). Fourth, be sensitive to the Holy Ghost (1 Corinthians 12:8-11)… The Holy Spirit is the dispenser of these gifts. Fifth, maintain a high level of faith in the Word (John 15:7, Joshua 1:8). Sixth, live a pure and holy life (2 Chronicles 16:9)… God is looking for someone to use. Uphold the purity of God within yourself. Seventh, cultivate boldness (Acts 4:29-30, 2 Timothy 1:7)… The Apostles prayed for boldness.
“The conference is an innovative dialogue between the creative and the technical needs of our new era in the music industry. We will present new ideas and tools, as well as looking at what works from our traditional ways of doing business in the music sector. The empowerment of entrepreneurial creative people in our business full of new opportunities as well as challenges is inspiring and deserves special attention.”- Anna Hildur
Samual Adams Whitewater IPA
Greetings.
God has restored what the enemy tried to destroy. Praise be to God!
DOLBY Digital
What really freaked me out is that when ordinary harmless citizens are whacked and walloped, the PM and his chosen cabinet are silent.
Personal injury, whether caused by a motoring accident or otherwise, will continue to happen and the victim will still need good legal representation to make the claim for compensation. For a large number of law firms, following a ban on referral fees, the problem of visibility to potential clients will become an even more serious problem unless they develop their profile on the web and other media to put their expertise and services before the potential client. Most people do not routinely have a ‘family solicitor’ and may well have had no cause to consult a solicitor before an accident happens. When an injury occurs they will, inevitably, seek advice on a local solicitor or search google. Some larger law firms and the new breed of legal services provider will have the budgets for television and other media advertising and will dominate the media, however most may not even get a nibble if they aren’t on the first page of google?
Even with a pretty nasty injury, I had a terrific time and I'm totally looking forward to another ridiculous hike with Kristyn next weekend.
Today was my 5 month appointment with Dr. A and it went great! We have felt so good all day because of it. It is such a relief because this was the appointment where we found out that Jacob had died. Today the eve of being the same amount pregnant as I was on the worst day of my life (I've written a post on my other blog about that).
And water-laden air
B: Dark, rich, sexy Founders Porter.
Pints for Prostates is a 501(c)3 a campaign that reaches men through the universal language of beer to encourage them to take charge of their health. The group was founded by prostate cancer survivor and beer writer Rick Lyke in 2008. The grassroots effort raises awareness among men about the importance of regular health screenings and PSA testing by making appearances at beer festivals, social networking and pro bono advertising. According to the National Cancer Institute, 240,890 new prostate cancer cases were diagnosed in the U.S. in 2011. More
The show was hard work, but we were fed well, offered a few free drinks and they put us up at Caesar's. The lobby was a little over-the-top, but the room itself was very good and had a nice view of the ocean and the boardwalk. It would be easier for me to grow a third eye than to gamble in a casino, so that part of the Atlantic City experience was lost on me. Besides, all the casinos smelled of stale cigarette smoke and desperation. Outside it smelled like the sea.
Near the end of the evening we put on St Georgen Kellerbier – there might be some left today if you’re lucky.
Harris, effectively, has admitted as much. “One form of teaching in this public-ness in this adjectival sense,” he noted, “asks students to consider how their lives are connected to and shaped by social forces and events.” Writing courses could be oriented around service learning, where “students collaborate with local activists”—on a topic, of course, pre-selected by the professor. Or the classes could have students comment on current affairs—screened, again, by the teacher. Harris celebrated one Duke class where students were asked to write about campaign against sweatshops and whether the Chronicle should have rejected an ad opposing reparations for African-Americans—two issues of great concern to the academic far left.
It is a serious exaggeration to claim, as many do today, that the Chinese economy is one massive real estate bubble. Yes, total fixed investment is approaching an unprecedented 50% of GDP, but residential and non-residential real estate, combined, accounts for only 15-20% of that — no more than 10% of the overall economy. In terms of floor space, residential construction accounts for half of China’s real estate investment. Identifying the share of residential real estate that goes to private developers in the dozen or so first-tier cities suggests that less than 1% of GDP would be at risk in the event of a housing market collapse — not exactly a recipe for a hard landing.
Place beans and water in a large bowl and let sit overnight. I’ve found that using boiling water to soak the beans will significantly reduce cooking time the next day, but using warm water is fine too. When ready to use, drain, rinse and return beans to a pot and cover with 3 cups fresh water. Bring beans to the boil, reduce heat and simmer for 35 to 50 minutes *, or until beans are tender.
Dry fried bacon slices chopped into strips 2
Law Abiding Citizen (2009)
with the generous people who helped make everything happen.
Says, “I’m shedding all these tears because I’m your guy”
bloody no God,
The book discusses a 90-day rule before having sex and questions you should ask a man right out the gate (long-term goals, short-term goals). It also tells you how to distinguish if the man is a mamma’s boy or not very serious about you.
Looking forward to the party!
There are so many clever crafts and recipes by bloggers to soak up, we will be trying our own soon, will post more if it is a success!
At times, I feel as though my RA shares similarities with the story Alice in Wonderland. Like Alice, I wake up and I wonder, have I been changed in the night? Was I the same when I got up this morning? Sometimes I almost think I can remember feeling a little different. But, if I'm not the same, the next question is 'Who in the world am I?’ That is the great puzzle.
I loved Mom and she loved me, but that does not guarantee an easy relationship. I tried to write on Mothers Day but the day came and went. This morning I noticed the date and thought, it's time. Time to pay homage but to do it with honesty.
But suffice it to say that Adachi has wide-ranging interests. For instance, he carved out time to attend an immigration rally—anti-SB 1070, as you might have guessed. And he’s not the only out-of-stater to arrive.
Despite the cheesy reality show, this book is actually really good. It’s a story about a girl who grows in her faith and comes out of her shell. There are things in this story that are mixed up. Some things are too hard on her and some things are way too easy on her. The other girls and host of the show are way too hard on her and sharing her faith, particularly with Christian hater, is just way too easy. However, the author makes it work well and you put down the book with a feeling that the author understood teens completely.
to her blog or etsy shop for a peek, they come in several colors.
My kid's disability manifests itself in the classroom by him sitting quietly, softly talking to himself, looking beautiful and doing an excellent job pretending to be paying attention, but not learning a single thing unless there's somebody standing over his shoulder the whole time. He has an aide (Federally funded!!) and there are a host of GenEd kids who are a huge disruption to the classroom. These kids don't have IEPs and I have no idea if they need one or not, but as they act out, the teacher, and my son's aide, are forced to turn their attention to those kids, while mine sits quietly, looking beautiful and not learning. Those GenEd kids, who don't have a 504 or an IEP, get referred to the Resource Coordinator as head of the Intervention team, because they're falling behind. Because the Resource Coordinator is now so strapped for time, I have a great deal of trouble even getting an IEP meeting scheduled. It's not her fault, she's doing the best she can, she just has way too much to do.
Horse Polo – Indian team or the team from Jaipur is credited with winning every tournament which existed between 1930 and 1938. That’s 9 consecutive world titles – which is more than India’s gold medals in Hockey at the Olympics.
Of course, we’re so good at creating schisms that we’ll do it just for fun and amusement. I used to belong to a forum for a specific sports car. When the car was new many of the postings reveled in the smug glory of having a better car than the rest of the world. Soon, a suggestion was made – in the spirit of fun (I think) – to create unofficial factions based on whether one’s car was a light or dark color. This spawned good natured bickering over the merits of having, say, a dark blue car vs the yellow one. Then, after four years, the car was updated and it became first generation vs second generation. Never mind, that you had to be a true car geek to tell the difference, this was serious. One person even posted that to like the first generation was to hate the second generation. What? Within just a few years the unity of common interest degenerated into dozens of “us vs them” groups bickering over arbitrary distinctions.
Frank M. Ahearn a former skip tracer, privacy expert and author of the bestselling book How to Disappear: Erase Your Digital Footprint, Leave False Trails, and Vanish without a Trace now brings to life a new how to book. The Digital Hit Man and His Weapons for Combating the Digital World.
Qualifications:
Angela came up with Classic Dill Julienne Fries. Honestly, I was torn between two choices as I really liked Angela's Classic Dill Julienne Fries as well as another finalist who came up with Thai Spiced Sweet Potato Julienne Fries. To me, they are both winners and I will definitely buy them any time. Both had their own distinct flavour and trust me will definitely have you ask for more. If you like, you can still vote for them and judge based on what you think taste good in your mind. To vote, go to www.facebook.com/Alexiafoods . So go show some support to our fellow bloggers. Every little bit helps right?
Size: 16 millimeters (0.6 in) by 10 millimeters (0.3 in)
Hundreds of tankers and trucks have been left stranded on highways and depots across Pakistan, with little or no security.
05-25 Yokohoma, Japan – Yokohoma Bay Hall
He’s not a big fan of sweet frosting, so I had a feeling when I saw this strawberry lemonade layer cake that he would enjoy it much more than the super-sweet cakes I usually end up making.
One option is to file a Chapter 7 bankruptcy. This is also known to many as “straight bankruptcy” or “liquidation”. It is the simplest and most common. Chapter 7 will allow you to discharge most type of debts such as credit cards and medical bills. It will not however cover secured debts such as child support, alimony, taxes or student loans.
However, don’t trade anyone okay?
While she was here, m'friend Glo did show me how to do drop spinning, and I've roughly got it. We've decided that varied thickenss yarn is actually that more expensive "slubbed yarn", so that's ok :-)
# Get too excited and indulge in a striptease.
So I hit "Continue" and find that in the Address field all that's listed is the full name of the recipient. This might make sense if there was anything after that, like a street address, but there is not.
I love cuddling in front of an old movie with a bowl of popcorn on a cold night.
“All his plans were suddenly overthrown, and the existence, so elaborately pictured, was no more than a dream which would never be realized. He was free once more. Free! He need give up none of his projects, and life still was in his hands for him to do what he liked with. He felt no exhiliration, but only dismay. His heart sank. The future stretched out before him in desolate emptiness. It was as though he had sailed for many years over a great waste of waters, with peril and privation, and at last had come upon a fair haven, but as he was about to enter, some contrary wind had arisen and drove him out again into the open sea; and because he had let his mind dwell on these meads and pleasant woods of the land, the vast deserts of the ocean filled him with anguish. He could not confront again the loneliness and the tempest.”
Now to try downloading my Fortune Cookie Video. And the new Blog Candy from Scrapbook Additions! I think your really going to like this one! :0)
A long time ago I went through a phase where I wore nothing but soft stretchy elastic bandeau bras from urban outfitters. This was well before I learned to sew my own and I chose them particularly because I have scar tissue on my rib, right where an under-wire would rest, and these were the only comfortable option for me.
Another line from In the Eye of the Storm says, “Out of fear would be born an act of faith, for faith is often the child of fear….Faith begins when you see God on the mountain and you are in the valley and you know that you’re too weak to make the climb. You see what you need, you see what you have, and what you have isn’t enough to accomplish anything…Faith that begins with fear will end up nearer the Father.”
Big breath. Let's do this.
The things that make a part of MMA training are mouth guards, head guards , various kinds of pads like for knee, wrist, elbow, training pads, groin protectors, hand wraps, gloves, shorts etc. A gym bag for carrying all the training equipment is a must have accessory that every MMA player must buy but before buying it must be made sure that it is long lasting and strong.
When the iPhone or iPad is connected to a laptop, this sensitive file is copied from the portable device to the laptop. Anyone who opens the file can scroll through and see a history of where you’ve been.
Special mention goes to the cute yellow box and black-ribboned packaging of macarons at LuxBite. And I was also impressed that Burch & Purchese staple a photocopy of your dessert description to each of your goodies so you know exactly what you're eating.
5:09 - Check on the turtle
I mean, who knew there were sales on clothing the week before Easter? Seriously - I do not enjoy shopping for clothes, and if you are anywhere over 5'10", I am sure you can sympathize.
I knew we were in for something special during the pre-show show, which featured the hosts talking to this lady in a French flag dress --
daughter knocks over a cup of coffee onto your business shirt. You have no control over what just what happened. What happens when the next will be determined by how you react.You curse. You harshly scold your daughter for knocking the cup over.
for more, always more,
Whatever I did to the sheep would prove nothing. Being a vegetarian for me is nothing to do with maintaining some sort of imagined purity of body or action. For example, I'm sure I take in the odd bit of invisible lard. If I visit someone and they offer me a piece of cake, I don't ask them what they made it out of. At this point, another dinner-guest will pipe up that in that case, I'm not a really vegetarian. Give it a rest, please. It's like telling a Christian they're not a Christian because they go to dinner parties and indulge in gluttony.
“A dude from Seattle. A dude from Salt Lake City. And a dude from Orlando. All came to Morocco to study, but all knew that their main focus would be traveling to see everything Morocco had to offer. The setting: Moulay Idriss, the quiet mountain village inset at the corner of a lush, expansive valley. The objective: climb as high into those mountains as was possible, and spend the night there. So they set out, backpacks stocked with cheap food, extra layers, and a sleeping bag. It would turn out to be the best weekend ever.”
Salvatore’s orcs are pretty bottom of the barrel. The only thing going for them is ugliness, sheer numbers and ferocity.
2:25 p.m. — 10 minutes remaining. Added 0.5 teaspoons yeast nutrient.
After much thought and consideration (going back and forth) I have decided to say "Goodbye" to the blogging world.
dart
It is one year on from the devastating earthquake in Haiti. The media circus has moved onto other things, but we will not forget.
And their friends, the loitering heirs of city directors; 180
Hurd will exec-produce a miniseries based on the books, together with Stephen Gallagher (The Eleventh Hour), who will pen the adaptation.
Just as I went home from a mall today, “Hotel California” was playing on the taxi’s radio. I heard all about the fuss about the song depicting Hell and the Church of Satan and I just wanted to confirm with my own ears. My conclusion…I do not know if that song is demonic or not. And I don’t care because there are other pressing matters which present themselves upon the entry of such a thought about the spiritual kingdom.
National Scrapbooking Day is celebrated in the US on the first Saturday in May but because we love this craft so much we try to make the enjoyment last a little longer!
There was one bride who told me that the site she registered at looks like guests are gifting you specific things to do while on your honeymoon, such as dinners, massages, sightseeing tours, but in reality the site would send the couple cash, less a 10% fee. I do not recommend this type of program because it is deceitful to your guests.
With Italian cinema (arguably) all but dead, how much hope do you have that we will ever see a full resurgence of these types of films coming out of Europe? Or will it just be a case of their influence being felt in the work of a new generation of filmmakers such as yourself?
BOTH of them hatched! Hurrah! You can see that this one is slightly younger than the other–its down is still matted from hatching. Don’t knock it. You wouldn’t look so hot yourself if you’d just spent the past several hours trying to break out of prison using nothing but your nose.
apparently, though I have no scientific proof, they are more
Assemblywoman Millman offered an alternative proposal: establish a much needed early childhood program at the site. The Assemblywoman also noted that, of the 90 or so calls her office had received about the co-location, not one call had been in support of the plan. Assemblymember Brennan referred to the plan as an attempt to "sever, fragment and divide the community".
before I cried.
Punch: Marvy Uchida
Tip # 2: To add some durability to my doll I add some clay inside, I brush the inside first with water, to make the new clay adhere.then I use my brush to neatly flatten it.^.^
My strategy for booking at NATAS: Do homework, stay focus and be early.
From 1670 to 1760, the Abenaki were considered by the Jesuits to be "the guardian angels" of their francophone colonies. They were at the perimeters and outposts of the settlements and outposts of New France, and suffered every time the British set out with their troops to conquer the territory. The Abenaki acted as a buffer, delaying the British long enough for the French to organise a counter-attack. During these colonial wars the Abenaki paid a heavy price. At the end of the wars, many Abenaki returned to the part of their homeland now occupied by the naissant USA. Others settled permanently at Odanak and Bécancour (W8linak). In 1812 they took up arms again on the side of the British, while the US fought on the side of the francophone colonists during the events of 1837.
#1 – Don’t have an extreme personality.
righteousness.
"But you don't do them right," he answered grumpily.
“Aye, we have a nice place up there, but Ulrica’s been wanting to meet your lambkin,” Aurelius replied, smirking at the young Flox. “For that and… well, for other reasons, her mind is made up. Rather than journey abroad, we’ll be spending our summer in the interior. How do you feel about long-term guests, Frey?”
When this surge reaches Earth’s magnetosphere, predictably three or four days later, some spectacular fireworks can occur. Usually the spaceweather team tries not to alarm earth populations more than they really have to. So electromagnetic disruptions to power supplies and weather systems are downplayed. Aurora borealis –northern lights– are emphasized instead.
By way of example, Behe uses the picture of a mousetrap which has five parts – a base, a hammer, a spring, a holding bar and a catch – that are absolutely necessary for the mousetrap to function. Remove any one of these parts and the mousetrap will no longer be able to catch mice. He goes on to show how you can’t build a mousetrap by Darwinian natural selection: nature would simply select against the continued production of the miscellaneous parts if they are not producing an immediate benefit to the organism.
The hip Brooklyn neighbs sprouting condo towers and serving artisan cheeses, selectively celebrating the borough's amenities while ignoring its inequalities ought to face that what they're buying into may be, in the words of one Brooklyn real estate agent, a 'boutique Manhattan.'
I have a lot of Coca Cola items in my Kitchen along with tea pots and many other vintage things.....
*Difficulty Breathing/Shortness of Breath.
Like carrion crows we live and feed on meat
Build templates to enforce a specific structure as writers create new content. Templates determine the model of the content and provide the writers with a blank structure to “fill in”. Key phrases, such as “In this section, you will learn:” to begin every concept module, can be preset in the template for 100% consistency. Using templates, the writers will begin to build new habits of working within consistent patterns.
known since moving to Norway is moving to Singapore this week (Bye
You get sick and tired of crying. You never knew it was possible to cry this much.
HM/HGH
Dallas Willard:
that a spring was breaking
i also heart iron man, i added a little red jelly heart to edward's chest, inspired by iron man and the ARC reactor, yup i'm still watching iron man every night LOL
Your thoughts
you will see more and more details of the girls'
Florence Horsbrugh, Minister of Education and MP for Manchester( Moss Side), added: 'Already becoming serious in Manchester.' David Maxwell Fyfe, the Home Secretary, gave a figure of 40,000 compared to 7,000 before the Second World War and raised the possibility of control. He said: 'There is a case on merits for exclude. riff-raff. But politically it wd. be represented & discussed on basis of colour limitation. That wd. offend the floating vote viz., the old Liberals. We shd. be reversing age-long tradition that. British Subjects have right of entry to mother-country of Empire. We should. offend Liberals, also sentimentalists.' He added: 'The colonial. populations are resented in Liverpool, Paddington & other areas by those who come into contact with them. But those who don't are apt to take a more Liberal view.'
Jazz.
“Oh,” Regan was disappointed, but undeterred. “Well, I’ll just have to see if I can find you and make you remember,” she promised before kissing him on the cheek softly and running off to join her friends.
Italianamerican (Martin Scorsese, 1974) - "Through their funny, charming stories, there emerges a portrait of the Italian-American experience in New York, and indeed the experience of all lower-class immigrants struggling to make lives for themselves in a new land. The cramped apartments, the large families, the kids working as soon as they're old enough rather than continuing in school, the wife supplementing her husband's income with sewing, the cooking, the sense of community: it's all told with such obvious love and tenderness and joy that the hardships and struggles don't seem nearly as important as the love of life and the hard-working values of these people."
Kati’s eyes convey cleverness and her features are so dark that it is difficult to make out her face at a distance. When one draws nearer… she is what I would describe as beautiful.
Dean Quinn, Hermione de Paula and Eudon Choi. I headed down to check out the possible next big things and to chat to them backstage...
Now add sugar and mix well. Sieve / strain the milk mixture and keep it in the fridge.
“Jeez, that’s alright! Where’s the bloke who owns this pub?”
･GALAPAGOS 003SH
I continue to toss and turn
So, that’s all it was, all this time?
The Philippines is blessed with rich water resources but we shall continue to have water problem unless we all work together to take care of our water sources. With the rate of our population (we grow too fast), it would not be possible that we can solve this water problem very soon.
3. turn on broiler to low and allow 5 minutes for the broiler to heat up, then broil the fish and onion 5 inches away from heat for 5 minutes
Grinning widely, Ismet proceeded to call out the types of food and the amounts that each household was to receive. We learned that each block had earlier received a list of households and the appropriated rations of several food categories. We were to receive following, which was to last the three of us a month:
Can losing weight get any simpler? I don’t think so. This example-day is the perfect sensible way of eating. You basically eat almost all of the time, you can (and should) take as much time as you want to ‘finish’ one of the food intakes, and if you want to you can stretch an intake over two hours or so and get straight into the next food intake time – easy!
"This is the way that pain (research) is going to go now, where you have very strong human genetic evidence and you're able to mount really large campaigns against tough targets and then take them through to the clinic," MacKay said.
There is a light in the deer, there is a light in the deer, there is a light deep inside the cavity deer! Now the blood surface song surface is heaving! It quakes through me and the deer. Fibers ache in my sharp border. Now the painful deer tears now it breaks. Now the deer and I burst and are exposed--
A character must lose occasionally or make mistakes. Where is the suspense if every time a character attempts to do something she succeeds? And in that loss is a shadow of the flaw, because the setback must be realistic. Did the character lose because of arrogance, assuming she knew what to do when she didn’t? Did the character lose because she wasn’t physically fit or knowledgeable enough? Did the character lose because she didn’t plan correctly, because she was unfocused, because of her inner conflicts? Such losses force a fully realized character to change so in the end she can succeed.
This was no rinky dink operation - Dad was a pro who had amassed an impressive, professional grade collection of tools and machinery over the course of countless Father's Days, birthdays, and Christmas gifts. I recently came across a resume he had handwritten to be considered for a board position he sought; under skills he had written: "avid, advanced woodworking." (He was voted President of that board). When Mom and Dad downsized in later years, the workshop was relocated to another basement beneath another kitchen. In his retirement, Dad was glad to have the space in a friend's basement for his beloved workshop.
Out of the grit of our own souls, we can reach His heart, and feel Him reaching for ours. No matter the pain of our past, present or future, God is there for us. He is able. Best of all, He is willing. “My soul glorifies the Lord this Christmas!”
I used precut plywood for the board base. I bought chalkboard paint (the most expensive part of the project) and a small roller. I painted the plywood with two coats of chalkboard paint and let dry completely. I then used liquid nails to adhere the chalkboard and whiteboard together. (FYI-I didn't even know what liquid nails were until this project.)
Oh wait, that was me!
p.s. speaking of "bring", my brother-in-law brought me a bottle of beer from Southern California that he said he particularly enjoyed. Lightning Brewery's Ionizer Lager. I'll report on that later.
I read this book when it was still in blog form. It is so funny! A Wars of the Roses spoof, told from the eyes of our heroine, Dakota FitzPercy. Who REALLY had the affair with Margaret of Anjou? Find out here….
Tim Belbe - Saxophone
and drift off to sleep to a sweet lullaby.
This morning they painted daddy a picture and mommy bought daddy some new clothes. This weekend we actually have even more to celebrate which I will make another post to talk all about our exciting news.
- meringues
That is exactly what the Americans had handed him during his first foray commanding Chinese troops under the U.N. flag.
MR. AZCUNA:
I was entranced. It was exactly the way The Rocky Horror Picture Show was meant to be experienced -- no shag carpet, no slumber party, no Christmas stockings -- just fishnet stockings. Just a room full of freaks being freaky, shoutings things at the screen and throwing toilet paper when Dr. Scott comes in. The cast was great, we did the Time Warp, and I was even able to use many of the audience participation lines I had practiced at home, from, "Fuck you, front row!" to, "Hi, Oblivion, how's the wife and kids?" It was an absolute pleasure.
Okay, this album has its light and airy moments but for the most part it is dealing with heavy issues. Emotions permeate many of the songs, and many can be deemed on the Gothic side.
2 cups wheat
In addition to their sled dogs, my friends had these adorable poodle puppies. They had six, but three of them have been sold so far. They're ten weeks old and apricot colored- aren't they cute?
Why, think of everything you’ve got.
AK: American students have a wonderful creative notion of learning; they aren’t shy in the classroom, and they haven’t been taught to learn by rote. My French colleagues are challenged and delighted by their experience teaching Americans, and often transform their own classrooms as a result.
Madison Ave Park, Murrieta
David Corbett and his wife Sandy of Gabby’s Palace in Burlington.
Workout for today was Cardio Axe and Sculpt. I'm thinking that maybe I should get some 8-pound weights because there are a few times in Sculpt where I'm feeling my 5-pounds are a little light. Not the whole workout, mind you, but a couple exercises. I also went grocery shopping today and got some acai juice for the first time. And let me tell you--that stuff is freaking expensive! It will last me a while 'cause I'm only going to drink a little at a time, but still. Tomorrow I will be heading to the library to pick up a few books that I've been wanting to read for a while. One on my list is "In Defense of Food" by Michael Pollan. I've heard so many good things about this book. Have any of you read it? What did you think?
Value : DumpType
to tell of quiets lest profound,
I am a fantasy writer. I’m not sure why, perhaps it’s because I’m part of the Harry Potter generation or perhaps it’s because I’ve always been a bit imaginative… Who knows… I’ve never really been able to write anything fully grounded in reality. God knows that my English teachers have given up on trying to improve my analytical writing. They always announce puzzlement at the contrast in coherency and skill when it comes to comparing my analytical and creative writing.
- Learn to breathe through your belly: standing up, feet flat on the ground, knees slightly bent, buttocks tight, shoulders backwards, look up and focus on a far away point. Inhale through the nose, slowly, inflating your belly, and exhale through the mouth, now deflating your belly without rounding the back. This exercise is as effective as a gym class, and you can practice while walking, waiting for the bus, or even between classes!
I don’t know exactly what my version cost—but it was a LOT less than $100!
Meanwhile, I just calculated that yesterday’s swim was 112 lengths of the pool, which is a hair under 1.6 miles.
25. Unanswered - Social Insecurity
Army Field Manual which is totally gay
Apart from the poor bloody teachers, what really upsets people about this - misinformation - is the reflection on themselves. Realistically, for most of us, that's a minor nuisance unless you work with a jerk who knows you dance tango and won't shut up.
When I was a man you could call a man
The kids' pictures face-down
The great thing about this project is that it is so easy to change up and you can use whatever Designer Series Paper you want! I LOVE it!
This deliberate intention set me thinking. Robert Dilts came up with an idea of neuro-logical levels, in which he proposed the following levels:
I can hardly believe I am sitting here, writing a post about how I actually finished student teaching. I can still remember exactly how I felt just a few days before I met my students. And so much has changed since that day in April when we met the "survivors" of last year's cohort to discuss the wild ride we were in for. I remember looking at them and thinking: "Wow. These people are amazing. What was their secret to getting through this so successfully? They must know so much more then me." They were my pretty much my idols. I wanted to be them someday. And now, it's surreal to think that I am.
Nicholas’ brain runs on and is excellent at processing data and concrete facts. He works best with things he can quantify. He runs into an almost insurmountable challenge in trying to rationalize the existence of his exceptional infant daughter and what she represents. He isn’t without a sense of humor and is very loving but he is forced to radically confront his limitations.
So what do we do when the road gives drivers visual cues to go faster than it's really safe to go? Sinclair and the State DOT - and Borough President Ruben Diaz Junior - have only one answer: spend more money. Spend $232 million dollars to replace the bridge (as a link provided by the Journal News shows), raise the curbs, add shoulders and even a "FULLY ADA COMPLIANT SHARED-USE PATH." But for the section of the Parkway north of Bronxville, even Steve Anderson, who is usually not shy about spending other people's money on roads, actually recommends that the number of lanes be reduced to discourage speeding.
We have been incredibly proud of building a product that is used and beloved by so many of you. We continue to be amazed and humbled by the photos you create and we are immensely grateful for all of your support, creativity, and passion.
I only ever crave Nachos. With guacamole and sour cream and cheese and meat (sometimes).
15 years is far too short a time
Here is the before and After photo.
“If all these athletes can do what they do, then surely you guys can get moving and help the people in your lives get moving, right? So that’s going to be one of our very important goals with the Olympic Games, is using this as a way for us to be inspired to be as healthy as we can all of the time. Do you think we can do that?"
-Once you have a good stockpile, you start planning your weekly menus based around what you have in stock. Then you can spend $20-30 on just the deals that week and $20-30 on fresh produce for the week.
Reason 3: With AdWords, you can go target your prospects geographically down to countries, states and cities. This is a great advantage for businesses selling hard goods or services – they would prefer local prospects as opposed to someone half way across the world.
Council Meetings
Arrange the stamped banners before adding glue. Mae likes silicone glue. It dries fast and easy to work with.
Suddenly the charts became a whole heck of a lot more meaningful and powerful.
But that’s just an aside, really. Let’s get back to the Mayor…
It was designed by Carl Ludvig Engel, to form the climax of the whole Senate Square laid out by Engel, surrounded by a number of buildings all designed by him. The Senate Square is located at the heart of Helsinki and its architecture presents a unique allegory of political, religious, scientific and commercial powers in the centre of Helsinki, Finland. Today, the Senate Square is one of the main tourist attractions of Helsinki. Various art happenings, ranging from concerts to snow buildings to controversial snow board happenings, have been set up on the Senate Square. Also at the Senate Square is a statue of Emperor Alexander II(shown below), who was the Emperor of the Russian Empire from 3 March 1855 until 1881. The statue was built in 1894 to commemorate his re-establishment the Diet of Finland in 1863, as well as his initiation of several reforms that increased Finland’s autonomy from Russia.
Last week she made Easy Sticky Buns and my mouth fell open at how delish they looked. I had all the ingredients on hand, so I made them the next morning.
If you are an old university romantic, these wonderful romantic quotations will motivate you, certainly.
And that is exactly what Lee’s brother said, according to Angel Smedley, who often represented Quacker factory on QVC.
I know my second grandchild will give me so much joy as the joy my little Richard gives me,I have faith this help me ,owever it make's me nervius too..
drill and drill bit
I feel bad about things when I shouldn't.
-structuring and assembling a 2 tier cake
Why should we confess our sin? Because God says we should.
“You facking cunt Tony. You were kissing Sharon!" Screams the quite irate Tracy.
As was alluded to in the opening, keep an eye out for future episodes of GABS. Taphouse co-owner Steve Jeffares is a man who only thinks in one size – big. If this one goes to plan then next year may see GABS move out of the family home and into a much larger venue featuring more taps showcasing more brewers and serving more expectant beer lovers.
One of the most popular early pin-up girls was Betty Grable. Her poster was
There had been racial battles in 1870s and 1911 in Cardiff with the Chinese community. But in 1919 they caused five deaths and serious injuries. Whole areas were cordoned off by the police and hundreds taken into protective custody. The Times reported the Cardiff battle:
Speed correction info:
What to do.... I was an easy hike from the trail head, with about a quart and a half of water. Do I hike out, call off the adventure? Or do I continue the adventure, ration my water and hike the 5 miles further into the desert hoping that the spring would have water? If it didn’t, I’d have a little more than a pint of water for the 10+ miles back to the trailhead.
it in a wedding magazine and fell in love! I'm obsessed with mixing
“Much better,” Xu Guan nodded to himself as he replaced the blade of the hacksaw.
Lots of people who are much smarter than me have spent their lives studying this kind of stuff so I’m going to use the theories of one of those people: Geert Hofstede.
She woke to a rough tongue licking her face, and hot fish breath. She pushed the offending creature away, and tried to sit up. Hard rock dug into her back, and she rolled over and nearly smacked her nose on the ground.
Weekly Wisdom: I think I'm all out of wisdom.
Gah, it's been a week since I posted. Didn't realize it had been that long... Well, I have good reason. I ended up getting another job, which is good financially, but not so good as far as my time goes. There end up being a couple days a week where I work 15 hours, and then I end up trying to fit sleep, exercise, chores, doing errands, and getting my proper meals into that. It's stressful and crappy and I really wish that I didn't have to work two jobs just to survive, but such is life. I have been getting my workouts in, and I've been eating well for the most part. I did stick to my menu plan as scheduled all last week, so yay for that!
They won't consider Witbier,
The release goes on to state that the new MacBook won’t see shelves until quarter four 2012, but our inside sources have told us a Limited Edition 20-million unit run will be made available for pre-order at an “Executive Price” to customers with Apple Platinum ID status this fall. The news appears to have gotten out, as lines of Apple Platinum ID members have already begun to appear outside Apple’s Fifth Avenue store.
Don’t think that when you are sleeping, meditation process is on. Sleeping is a passive process, you are taking rest but your mind or inner conscience works in some or the other way, for example dreams. In meditation you are actually giving rest to your mind and this is very active process. In meditation you keep your mind focused to one point and this need extreme concentration level.
It took 1.5 hours between the designated arrival time to the arrival of the VIP! I started to get a bit worried when I realised I didn't see /make her pee that morning. So I was relieved when I saw her school teacher bringing her to the loo.
Fursty Ferret - ('Seasonal' amber ale. Available year-round in bottles)
When it comes to corporate reporting and disclosure. Also, there is definitely much easier and more beneficial to the architecture dover delaware, the architecture dover delaware are formed in the architecture dover delaware are now Lewes, Milton, Angola, Long Neck, Broadkill, Nassau, Cool Spring, Whitesville, Quakertown and Red Mill Pond.
Though the Storm Makers have traditionally been more along the lines of storm alleviators, working to help gentle severe weather, the new official leader, Rupert London, has a different agenda. According to Otis, London wants to let the weather take its toll on the people who are destroying the planet. Otis, however, isn't telling the kids the whole truth--one that is even darker and more destructive. A plan that involves setting up the long draught...setting the stage for an epic disaster.
The only downside is this is the beginning of what Chris Sims points out as a over-reliance on rape as a motivator, even though it is only mentioned in passing by Bat Lash. Don't worry, we'll being hearing and seeing a lot more of that plot device in the upcoming years (Rape Count: 1 reference)
Do not use products that irritate your skin in any way, including soaps that have harsh ingredients. If possible, use a moisturizing soap or that which is designed for sensitive skin.
Retirement Security:
- Mary Carolyn Davies
My parents eventually petitioned for me and well, it looks like I am finally coming home. Or … was I?
The treasure chest is in my office as well. It is the box I will grab if I ever have to leave the house in an emergency. There are lots of sentimental items inside, such as my sons baptism outfit and some gifts my lads made for me at school – precious.
It’s a pity that so much of the discussion about voting this fall will be drenched in race. Americans have two important rights when it comes to voting. The first is the right to vote without fear and intimidation, for which this country fought an epic civil-rights struggle in the 1960s. Those gains in voter access must be preserved. But Americans also have a right to vote without their ballots’ being canceled out by people who are voting twice, are voting for the dead or nonexistent, or are non-citizens. We can and should accomplish two goals in the 2012 election — making sure it is easy to vote, and making sure it is hard to cheat. Groups such as True the Vote will be essential to make sure both sides of that imperative are fulfilled.
and landed badly on a bollard,
